

SACK
Sack, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Sacked; p. pr. & vb. n. Sacking.] Etym:
[See Sack pillage.]

Defn: To plunder or pillage, as a town or city; to devastate; to
ravage.
The Romans lay under the apprehension of seeing their city sacked by
a barbarous enemy. Addison.

SACKAGE
Sack"age (; 48), n.

Defn: The act of taking by storm and pillaging; sack. [R.] H. Roscoe.

SACKBUT
Sack"but, n. Etym: [F. saquebute, OF. saqueboute a sackbut. earlier,
a sort of hook attached to the end of a lance used by foot soldiers
to unhorse cavalrymen; prop. meaning, pull and push; fr. saquier,
sachier, to pull, draw (perhaps originally, to put into a bag or take
out from a bag; see Sack a bag) + bouter to push (see Butt to
thrust). The name was given to the musical instrument from its being
lengthened and shortened.] (Mus.)

Defn: A brass wind instrument, like a bass trumpet, so contrived that
it can be lengthened or shortened according to the tone required; --
said to be the same as the trombone. [Written also sagbut.] Moore
(Encyc. of Music).

Note: The sackbut of the Scriptures is supposed to have been a
stringed instrument.

SACKCLOTH
Sack"cloth`, n.

Defn: Linen or cotton cloth such a sacks are made of; coarse cloth;
anciently, a cloth or garment worn in mourning, distress,
mortification, or penitence.
Gird you with sackcloth, and mourn before Abner. 2 Sam. iii. 31.
Thus with sackcloth I invest my woe. Sandys.

SACKCLOTHED
sack"clothed`, a.

Defn: Clothed in sackcloth.

SACKER
Sack"er, n.

Defn: One who sacks; one who takes part in the storm and pillage of a
town.

SACKFUL
Sack"ful, n.; pl. Sackfuls (.

Defn: As much as a sack will hold.

SACKFUL
Sack"ful, a.

Defn: Bent on plunder. [Obs.] Chapman.

SACKING
Sack"ing, n. Etym: [AS. sæccing, from sæcc sack, bag.]

Defn: Stout, coarse cloth of which sacks, bags, etc., are made.

SACKLESS
Sack"less, a. Etym: [AS. sacleás; sacu contention + leás loose, free
from.]

Defn: Quiet; peaceable; harmless; innocent. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.]

SACK-WINGED
Sack"-winged`, a. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Having a peculiar pouch developed near the front edge of the
wing; -- said of certain bats of the genus Saccopteryx.

SACQUE
Sacque, n. Etym: [Formed after the analogy of the French. See 2d
Sack.]

Defn: Same as 2d Sack, 3.

SACRAL
Sa"cral, a. (Anat.)

Defn: Of or pertaining to the sacrum; in the region of the sacrum.

SACRAMENT
Sac"ra*ment, n. Etym: [L. sacramentum an oath, a sacred thing, a
mystery, a sacrament, fr. sacrare to declare as sacred, sacer sacred:
cf. F. sacrament. See Sacred.]

1. The oath of allegiance taken by Roman soldiers; hence, a sacred
ceremony used to impress an obligation; a solemn oath-taking; an
oath. [Obs.]
I'll take the sacrament on't. Shak.

2. The pledge or token of an oath or solemn cobenant; a sacred thing;
a mystery. [Obs.]
God sometimes sent a light of fire, and pillar of a cloud . . . and
the sacrament of a rainbow, to guide his people through their portion
of sorrows. Jer. Taylor.

3. (Theol.)

Defn: One of the solemn religious ordinances enjoined by Christ, the
head of the Christian church, to be observed by his followers; hence,
specifically, the eucharist; the Lord's Supper.

Syn.
 -- Sacrament, Eucharist.
 -- Protestants apply the term sacrament to baptism and the Lord's
Supper, especially the latter. The R. Cath. and Greek churches have
five other sacraments, viz., confirmation, penance, holy orders,
matrimony, and extreme unction. As sacrament denotes an oath or vow,
the word has been applied by way of emphasis to the Lord's Supper,
where the most sacred vows are renewed by the Christian in
commemorating the death of his Redeemer. Eucharist denotes the giving
of thanks; and this term also has been applied to the same ordinance,
as expressing the grateful remembrance of Christ's sufferings and
death. "Some receive the sacrament as a means to procure great graces
and blessings; others as an eucharist and an office of thanksgiving
for what they have received." Jer. Taylor.

SACRAMENT
Sac"ra*ment, v. t.

Defn: To bind by an oath. [Obs.] Laud.

SACRAMENTAL
Sac`ra*men"tal, a. Etym: [L. sacramentalis: cf. F. sacramental,
sacramentel.]

1. Of or pertaining to a sacrament or the sacraments; of the nature
of a sacrament; sacredly or solemny binding; as, sacramental rites or
elements.

2. Bound by a sacrament.
The sacramental host of God's elect. Cowper.

SACRAMENTAL
Sac`ra*men"tal, n.

Defn: That which relates to a sacrament. Bp. Morton.

SACRAMENTALISM
Sac`ra*men"tal*ism, n.

Defn: The doctrine and use of sacraments; attashment of excessive
importance to sacraments.

SACRAMENTALIST
Sac`ra*men"tal*ist, n.

Defn: One who holds the doctrine of the real objective presence of
Christ;s body and blood in the holy eucharist. Shipley.

SACRAMENTALLY
Sac`ra*men"tal*ly, adv.

Defn: In a sacrament manner.

SACRAMENTARIAN
Sac`ra*men*ta"ri*an, n. Etym: [LL. sacramentarius: cf. F.
sacramentaire.]

1. (Eccl.)

Defn: A name given in the sixteenth century to those German reformers
who rejected both the Roman and the Lutheran doctrine of the holy
eucharist.

2. One who holds extreme opinions regarding the efficacy of
sacraments.

SACRAMENTARIAN
Sac`ra*men*ta"ri*an, a.

1. Of or pertaining a sacrament, or to the sacramentals; sacramental.

2. Of or pertaining to the Sacramentarians.

SACRAMENTARY
Sac`ra*men"ta*ry, a.

1. Of or pertaining a sacrament or the sacraments; sacramental.

2. Of or pertaining to the Sacramentarians.

SACRAMENTARY
Sac`ra*men"ta*ry, n.; pl. -ries. Etym: [LL. sacramentarium: cf. F.
sacramentaire.]

1. An ancient book of the Roman Catholic Church, written by Pope
Gelasius, and revised, corrected, and abridged by St. Gregory, in
which were contained the rites for Mass, the sacraments, the
dedication of churches, and other ceremonies. There are several
ancient books of the same kind in France and Germany.

2. Same as Sacramentarian, n., 1.
Papists, Anabaptists, and Sacramentaries. Jer. Taylor.

SACRAMENTIZE
Sac"ra*ment*ize, v. i.

Defn: To administer the sacraments. [R.]
Both to preach and sacramentize. Fuller.

SACRARIUM
Sa*cra"ri*um, n.; pl. -ria. Etym: [L., fr. sacer sacred.]

1. A sort of family chapel in the houses of the Romans, devoted to a
special divinity.

2. The adytum of a temple. Gwilt.

3. In a Christian church, the sanctuary.

SACRATE
Sa"crate, v. t. Etym: [L. sacratus, p.p. of sacrare. See Sacred.]

Defn: To consecrate. [Obs.]

SACRATION
Sa*cra"tion, n.

Defn: Consecration. [Obs.]

SACRE
Sa"cre, n.

Defn: See Sakker.

SACRE
Sa"cre, v. t. Etym: [F. sacrer. See Sacred.]

Defn: To consecrate; to make sacred. [Obs.] Holland.

SACRED
Sa"cred, a. Etym: [Originally p.p. of OE. sacren to consecrate, F.
sacrer, fr. L. sacrare, fr. sacer sacred, holy, cursed. Cf.
Consecrate, Execrate, Saint, Sextion.]

1. Set apart by solemn religious ceremony; especially, in a good
sense, made holy; set apart to religious use; consecrated; not
profane or common; as, a sacred place; a sacred day; sacred service.

2. Relating to religion, or to the services of religion; not secular;
religious; as, sacred history.
Smit with the love of sacred song. Milton.

3. Designated or exalted by a divine sanction; possessing the highest
title to obedience, honor, reverence, or veneration; entitled to
extreme reverence; venerable.
Such neighbor nearness to our sacred [royal] blood Should nothing
privilege him. Shak.
Poet and saint to thee alone were given, The two most sacred names of
earth and heaven. Cowley.

4. Hence, not to be profaned or violated; inviolable.
Secrets of marriage still are sacred held. Dryden.

5. Consecrated; dedicated; devoted; -- with to.
A temple, sacred to the queen oflove. Dryden.

6. Solemnly devoted, in a bad sense, as to evil, vengeance, curse, or
the like; accursed; baleful. [Archaic]
But, to destruction sacred and devote. Milton.

Society of the Sacred Heart (R.C. Ch.), a religious order of women,
founded in France in 1800, and approved in 1826. It was introduced
into America in 1817. The members of the order devote themselves to
the higher branches of female education.
 -- Sacred baboon. (Zoöl.) See Hamadryas.
 -- Sacred bean (Bot.), a seed of the Oriental lotus (Nelumbo
speciosa or Nelimbium speciosum), a plant resembling a water lily;
also, the plant itself. See Lotus.
 -- Sacred beetle (Zoöl.) See Scarab.
 -- Sacred canon. See Canon, n., 3.
 -- Sacred fish (Zoöl.), any one of fresh-water African fishes of the
family Mormyridæ. Several large species inhabit the Nile and were
considered sacred by the ancient Egyptians; especially Mormyris
oxyrhynchus.
 -- Sacred ibis. See Ibis.
 -- Sacred monkey. (Zoöl.) (a) Any Asiatic monkey of the genus
Semnopitchecus, regarded as sacred by the Hindoos; especially, the
entellus. See Entellus. (b) The sacred baboon. See Hamadryas. (c) The
blunder monkey.
 -- Sacred place (Civil Law), the place where a deceased person is
buried.

Syn.
 -- Holy; divine; hallowed; consecrated; dedicated; devoted;
religious; venerable; reverend.
 -- Sa"cred*ly, adv.
 -- Sa"cred*ness, n.

SACRIFIC; SACRIFICAL
Sacrif"ic, Sa*crif"ic*al, a. Etym: [L. sacrificus, sacrificalis. See
Sacrifice.]

Defn: Employed in sacrifice. [R.] Johnson.

SACRIFICABLE
Sa*crif"ic*a*ble, a.

Defn: Capable of being offered in sacrifice. [R.] Sir T. Browne.

SACRIFICANT
Sa*crif"ic*ant, n. Etym: [L. sacrificans, p.pr. See Sacrifice.]

Defn: One who offers a sacrifice. [R.]

SACRIFICATOR
Sac"ri*fi*ca`tor, n. Etym: [L.]

Defn: A sacrificer; one who offers a sacrifice. [R.] Sir T. Browne.

SACRIFICATORY
Sa*crif"ic`a*to*ry, n. Etym: [Cf. F. sacrificatoire.]

Defn: Offering sacrifice. [R.] Sherwood.

SACRIFICE
Sac"ri*fice, n. Etym: [OE. sacrifise, sacrifice, F. sacrifice, fr. L.
sacrificium; sacer sacer + facere to make. See Sacred, and Fact.]

1. The offering of anything to God, or to a god; consecratory rite.
Great pomp, and sacrifice, and praises loud, To Dagon. Milton.

2. Anything consecrated and offered to God, or to a divinity; an
immolated victin, or an offering of any kind, laid upon an altar, or
otherwise presented in the way of religious thanksgiving, atonement,
or conciliation.
Moloch, horrid king, besmeared with blood Of human sacrifice. Milton.
My life, if thou preserv's my life, Thy sacrifice shall be. Addison.

3. Destruction or surrender of anything for the sake of something
else; devotion of some desirable object in behalf of a higher object,
or to a claim deemed more pressing; hence, also, the thing so devoted
or given up; as, the sacrifice of interest to pleasure, or of
pleasure to interest.

4. A sale at a price less than the cost or the actual value.
[Tradesmen's Cant] Burnt sacrifice. See Burnt offering, under Burnt.
 -- Sacrifice hit (Baseball), in batting, a hit of such a kind that
the batter loses his chance of tallying, but enables one or more who
are on bases to get home or gain a base.

SACRIFICE
Sac"ri*fice, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Sacrificed (; p. pr. & vb. n.
Sacrificing (.] Etym: [From Sacrifice, n.: cf. F. sacrifier, L.
sacrificare; sacer sacred, holy + -ficare (only in comp.) to make.
See -fy.]

1. To make an offering of; to consecrate or present to a divinity by
way of expiation or propitiation, or as a token acknowledgment or
thanksgiving; to immolate on the altar of God, in order to atone for
sin, to procure favor, or to express thankfulness; as, to sacrifice
an ox or a sheep.
Oft sacrificing bullock, lamb, or kid. Milton.

2. Hence, to destroy, surrender, or suffer to be lost, for the sake
of obtaining something; to give up in favor of a higher or more
imperative object or duty; to devote, with loss or suffering.
Condemned to sacrifice his childish years To babbling ignorance, and
to empty fears. Prior.
The Baronet had sacrificed a large sum . . . for the sake of . . .
making this boy his heir. G. Eliot.

3. To destroy; to kill. Johnson.

4. To sell at a price less than the cost or the actual value.
[Tradesmen's Cant]

SACRIFICE
Sac"ri*fice, v. i.

Defn: To make offerings to God, or to a deity, of things consumed on
the altar; to offer sacrifice.
O teacher, some great mischief hath befallen To that meek man, who
well had sacrificed. Milton.

SACRIFICER
Sac"ri*fi`cer, n.

Defn: One who sacrifices.

SACRIFICIAL
Sac`ri*fi"cial, a.

Defn: Of or pertaining to sacrifice or sacrifices; consisting in
sacrifice; performing sacrifice. "Sacrificial rites." Jer. Taylor.

SACRILEGE
Sac"ri*lege, n. Etym: [F. sacrilège, L. sacrilegium, from sacrilegus
that steals, properly, gathers or picks up, sacred things; sacer
sacred + legere to gather, pick up. See Sacred, and Legend.]

Defn: The sin or crime of violating or profaning sacred things; the
alienating to laymen, or to common purposes, what has been
appropriated or consecrated to religious persons or uses.
And the hid treasures in her sacred tomb With sacrilege to dig.
Spenser.
Families raised upon the ruins of churches, and enriched with the
spoils of sacrilege. South.

SACRILEGIOUS
Sac`ri*le"gious, a. Etym: [From sacrilege: cf. L. sacrilegus.]

Defn: Violating sacred things; polluted with sacrilege; involving
sacrilege; profane; impious.
Above the reach of sacrilegious hands. pope.
-- Sac`ri*le"gious*ly, adv.
 -- Sac`ri*le"gious*ness, n.

SACRILEGIST
Sac"ri*le`gist, n.

Defn: One guilty of sacrilege.

SACRING
Sac"ring,

Defn: a. & n. from Sacre. Sacring bell. See Sanctus bell, under
Sanctus.

SACRIST
Sa"crist, n. Etym: [LL. sacrista. See Sacristan.]

Defn: A sacristan; also, a person retained in a cathedral to copy out
music for the choir, and take care of the books.

SACRISTAN
Sac"ris*tan, n. Etym: [F. sacristian, LL. sacrista, fr. L. sacer. See
Sacred, and cf. Sexton.]

Defn: An officer of the church who has the care of the utensils or
movables, and of the church in general; a sexton.

SACRISTY
Sac"ris*ty, n.; pl. Sacristies. Etym: [F. sacristie, LL. sacristia,
fr. L. sacer. See Sacred.]

Defn: A apartment in a church where the sacred utensils, vestments,
etc., are kept; a vestry.

SACRO-
Sa"cro- (. (Anat.)

Defn: A combining form denoting connection with, or relation to, the
sacrum, as in sacro-coccyageal, sacro-iliac, sacrosciatic.

SACROSANCT
Sac"ro*sanct, a. Etym: [L. sucrosanctus.]

Defn: Sacred; inviolable. [R.] Dr. H. More.

SACROSCIATIC
Sa`cro*sci*at"ic, a. (Anat.)

Defn: Of or pertaining to both the sacrum and the hip; as, the
sacrosciatic formina formed by the sacrosciatic ligaments which
connect the sacrum and hip bone.

SACROVERTEBRAL
Sa`cro*ver"te*bral, a. (Anat.)

Defn: Of or pertaining to the sacrum and that part of the vertebral
column immediately anterior to it; as, the sacrovertebral angle.

SACRUM
sa"crum, n.; pl. sacra (. Etym: [NL., fr. L. sacer sacred, os sacrum
the lowest bone of the spine.] (Anat.)

Defn: That part of the vertebral column which is directly connected
with, or forms a part of, the pelvis.

Note: It may consist of a single vertebra or of several more or less
consolidated. In man it forms the dorsal, or posterior, wall of the
pelvis, and consists of five united vertebræ, which diminish in size
very rapidly to the posterior extremity, which bears the coccyx.

SACS
Sacs, n. pl.; sing. Sac (. (Ethnol.)

Defn: A tribe of Indians, which, together with the Foxes, formerly
occupied the region about Green Bay, Wisconsin. [Written also Sauks.]

SAD
Sad, a. [Compar. Sadder; supperl. Saddest.] Etym: [OE. sad sated,
tired, satisfied, firm, steadfast, AS. sæd satisfied, sated; akin to
D. zat, OS. sad, G. tt, OHG. sat, sa, saddr, Goth. saps, Lith. sotus,
L. sat, satis, enough, satur sated, Gr. Assets, Sate, Satiate,
Satisfy Satire.]

1. Sated; satisfied; weary; tired. [Obs.]
Yet of that art they can not waxen sad, For unto them it is a bitter
sweet. Chaucer.

2. Heavy; weighty; ponderous; close; hard. [Obs., except in a few
phrases; as, sad bread.]
His hand, more sad than lump of lead. Spenser.
Chalky lands are naturally cold and sad. Mortimer.

3. Dull; grave; dark; somber; -- said of colors. "Sad-colored
clothes." Walton.
Woad, or wade, is used by the dyers to lay the foundation of all sad
colors. Mortimer.

4. Serious; grave; sober; steadfast; not light or frivolous. [Obs.]
"Ripe and sad courage." Bacon.
Which treaty was wisely handled by sad and discrete counsel of both
parties. Ld. Berners.

5. Affected with grief or unhappiness; cast down with affliction;
downcast; gloomy; mournful.
First were we sad, fearing you would not come; Now sadder, that you
come so unprovided. Shak.
The angelic guards ascended, mute and sad. Milton.

6. Afflictive; calamitous; causing sorrow; as, a sad accident; a sad
misfortune.

7. Hence, bad; naughty; troublesome; wicked. [Colloq.] "Sad tipsy
fellows, both of them." I. Taylor.

Note: Sad is sometimes used in the formation of self-explaining
compounds; as, sad-colored, sad-eyed, sad-hearted, sad-looking, and
the like. Sad bread, heavy bread. [Scot. & Local, U.S.] Bartlett.

Syn.
 -- Sorrowful; mournful; gloomy; dejected; depressed; cheerless;
downcast; sedate; serious; grave; grievous; afflictive; calamitous.

SAD
Sad, v. t.

Defn: To make sorrowful; to sadden. [Obs.]
How it sadded the minister's spirits! H. Peters.

SADDA
Sad"da, n. Etym: [Per. sad-dar the hundred gates or ways; sad a
hundred + dar door, way.]

Defn: A work in the Persian tongue, being a summary of the Zend-
Avesta, or sacred books.

SADDEN
Sad"den, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Saddened; p. pr. & vb. n. Saddening.]

Defn: To make sad. Specifically:
(a) To render heavy or cohesive. [Obs.]
Marl is binding, and saddening of land is the great prejudice it doth
to clay lands. Mortimer.

(b) To make dull- or sad-colored, as cloth.
(c) To make grave or serious; to make melancholy or sorrowful.
Her gloomy presence saddens all the scene. Pope.

SADDEN
Sad"den, v. i.

Defn: To become, or be made, sad. Tennyson.

SADDER
Sad"der, n.

Defn: Same as Sadda.

SADDLE
Sad"dle, n. Etym: [OE. sadel, AS. sadol; akin to D. zadel, G. sattel,
OHG. satal, satul, Icel. söedhull, Dan. & Sw. sadel; cf. Russ.
siedlo; all perh. ultimately from the root of E. sit.]

1. A seat for a rider, -- usually made of leather, padded to span
comfortably a horse's back, furnished with stirrups for the rider's
feet to rest in, and fastened in place with a girth; also, a seat for
the rider on a bicycle or tricycle.

2. A padded part of a harness which is worn on a horse's back, being
fastened in place with a girth. It serves various purposes, as to
keep the breeching in place, carry guides for the reins, etc.

3. A piece of meat containing a part of the backbone of an animal
with the ribs on each side; as, a saddle of mutton, of venison, etc.

4. (Naut.)

Defn: A block of wood, usually fastened to some spar, and shaped to
receive the end of another spar.

5. (Mach.)

Defn: A part, as a flange, which is hollowed out to fit upon a convex
surface and serve as a means of attachment or support.

6. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The clitellus of an earthworm.

7. (Arch.)

Defn: The threshold of a door, when a separate piece from the floor
or landing; -- so called because it spans and covers the joint
between two floors. Saddle bar (Arch.), one the small iron bars to
which the lead panels of a glazed window are secured. Oxf. Gloss.
 -- Saddle gall (Far.), a sore or gall upon a horse's back, made by
the saddle.
 -- Saddle girth, a band passing round the body of a horse to hold
the saddle in its place.
 -- saddle horse, a horse suitable or trained for riding with a
saddle.
 -- Saddle joint, in sheet-metal roofing, a joint formed by bending
up the edge of a sheet and folding it downward over the turned-up
edge of the next sheet.
 -- Saddle roof (Arch.), a roof having two gables and one ridge; --
said of such a roof when used in places where a different form is
more common; as, a tower surmounted by a saddle roof. Called also
saddleback roof.
 -- Saddle shell (Zoöl.), any thin plicated bivalve shaell of the
genera Placuna and Anomia; -- so called from its shape. Called also
saddle oyster.

SADDLE
Sad"dle, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Saddled; p. pr. & vb. n. Saddling.]
Etym: [AS. sadelian.]

1. To put a saddle upon; to equip (a beast) for riding. "saddle my
horse." Shak.
Abraham rose up early saddled his ass. Gen. xxii. 3.

2. Hence: To fix as a charge or burden upon; to load; to encumber;
as, to saddle a town with the expense of bridges and highways.

SADDLEBACK
Sad"dle*back`, a.

Defn: Same as Saddle-backed. Saddleback roof. (Arch.) See Saddle
roof, under Saddle.

SADDLEBACK
Sad"dle*back`, n.

1. Anything saddle-backed; esp., a hill or ridge having a concave
outline at the top.

2. (Zoöl.)
(a) The harp seal.
(b) The great blackbacked gull (Larus marinus).
(c) The larva of a bombycid moth (Empretia stimulea) which has a
large, bright green, saddle-shaped patch of color on the back.

SADDLE-BACKED
Sad"dle-backed`, a.

1. Having the outline of the upper part concave like the seat of a
saddle.

2. Having a low back and high neck, as a horse.

SADDLEBAGS
Sad"dle*bags, n. pl.

Defn: Bags, usually of leather, united by straps or a band, formerly
much used by horseback riders to carry small articles, one bag
hanging on each side.

SADDLEBOW
Sad"dle*bow`, n. Etym: [AS. sadelboga.]

Defn: The bow or arch in the front part of a saddle, or the pieces
which form the front.

SADDLECLOTH
Sad"dle*cloth`, n.

Defn: A cloth under a saddle, and extending out behind; a housing.

SADDLED
Sad"dled, a. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Having a broad patch of color across the back, like a saddle;
saddle-backed.

SADDLER
Sad"dler, n. .

Defn: One who makes saddles.

2. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A harp seal.

SADDLERY
Sad"dler*y, n.

1. The materials for making saddles and harnesses; the articles
usually offered for sale in a saddler's shop.

2. The trade or employment of a saddler.

SADDLE-SHAPED
Sad"dle-shaped`, a.

Defn: Shaped like a saddle. Specifically:
(a) (Bot.) Bent down at the sides so as to give the upper part a
rounded form. Henslow.
(b) (Geol.) Bent on each side of a mountain or ridge, without being
broken at top; -- said of strata.

SADDLETREE
Sad"dle*tree`, n.

Defn: The frame of a saddle.
For saddletree scarce reached had he, His journey to begin. Cowper.

SADDUCAIC
Sad`du*ca"ic, a.

Defn: Pertaining to, or like, the Sadducees; as, Sadducaic
reasonings.

SADDUCEE
Sad"du*cee, n. Etym: [L. Sadducaei, p., Gr. Tsaddukim; -- so called
from Tsadok, the founder of the sect.]

Defn: One of a sect among the ancient Jews, who denied the
resurrection, a future state, and the existence of angels.
 -- Sad`du*ce"an, a.

SADDUCEEISM; SADDUCISM
Sad"du*cee`ism, Sad"du*cism, n.

Defn: The tenets of the Sadducees.

SADDUCIZE
Sad"du*cize, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Sadducized; p. pr. & vb. n.
Sadducizing.]

Defn: To adopt the principles of the Sadducees. Atterbury.

SADH
Sadh, n. Etym: [Skr. sadhu perfect, pure.]

Defn: A member of a monotheistic sect of Hindoos. Sadhs resemble the
Quakers in many respects. Balfour (cyc. of India).

SADIRON
Sad"i`ron, n. Etym: [Probably sad heavy + iron.]

Defn: An iron for smoothing clothes; a flatiron.

SADLY
Sad"ly, adv.

1. Wearily; heavily; firmly. [Obs.]
In go the spears full sadly in arest. Chaucer.

2. Seriously; soberly; gravely. [Obs.]
To tell thee sadly, shepherd, without blame Or our neglect, we lost
her as we came. Milton.

3. Grievously; deeply; sorrowfully; miserably. "He sadly suffers in
their grief." Dryden.

SADNESS
Sad"ness, n.

1. Heaviness; firmness. [Obs.]

2. Seriousness; gravity; discretion. [Obs.]
Her sadness and her benignity. Chaucer.

3. Quality of being sad, or unhappy; gloominess; sorrowfulness;
dejection.
Dim sadness did not spare That time celestial visages. Milton.

Syn.
 -- Sorrow; heaviness; dejection. See Grief.

SADR
Sadr, n. (Bot.)

Defn: A plant of the genus Ziziphus (Z. lotus); -- so called by the
Arabs of Barbary, who use its berries for food. See Lotus (b).

SAENGERBUND
Saeng"er*bund`, n.; G. pl. -bünde (#). [G. sängerbund.] (Music)

Defn: A singers' union; an association of singers or singing clubs,
esp. German.

SAENGERFEST
Saeng"er*fest, n. Etym: [G. sängerfest.]

Defn: A festival of singers; a German singing festival.

SAFE
Safe, a. [Compar. Safer; superl. Safest.] Etym: [OE. sauf, F. sauf,
fr. L. salvus, akin to salus health, welfare, safety. Cf. Salute,
Salvation, Sage a plant, Save, Salvo an exception.]

1. Free from harm, injury, or risk; untouched or unthreatened by
danger or injury; unharmed; unhurt; secure; whole; as, safe from
disease; safe from storms; safe from foes. "And ye dwelled safe." 1
Sam. xii. 11.
They escaped all safe all safe to land. Acts xxvii. 44.
Established in a safe, unenvied throne. Milton.

2. Conferring safety; securing from harm; not exposing to danger;
confining securely; to be relied upon; not dangerous; as, a safe
harbor; a safe bridge, etc. "The man of safe discretion." Shak.
The King of heaven hath doomed This place our dungeon, not our safe
retreat. Milton.

3. Incapable of doing harm; no longer dangerous; in secure care or
custody; as, the prisoner is safe.
But Banquo's safe Ay, my good lord, safe in a ditch he bides. Shak.
Safe hit (Baseball), a hit which enables the batter to get to first
base even if no error is made by the other side.

Syn.
 -- Secure; unendangered; sure.

SAFE
Safe, n.

Defn: A place for keeping things in safety. Specifically:
(a) A strong and fireproof receptacle (as a movable chest of steel,
etc., or a closet or vault of brickwork) for money, valuable papers,
or the like.
(b) A ventilated or refrigerated chest or closet for securing
provisions from noxious animals or insects.

SAFE
Safe, v. t.

Defn: To render safe; to make right. [Obs.] Shak.

SAFE-CONDUCT
Safe"-con"duct, n. Etym: [Safe + conduct: cf. F. sauf-conduit.]

Defn: That which gives a safe, passage; either
(a) a convoy or guard to protect a person in an enemy's country or a
foreign country, or
(b) a writing, pass, or warrant of security, given to a person to
enable him to travel with safety. Shak.

SAFE-CONDUCT
Safe`-con*duct", v. t.

Defn: To conduct safely; to give safe-conduct to. [POetic]
He him by all the bonds of love besought To safe-conduct his love.
Spenser.

SAFEGUARD
Safe"guard`, n. Etym: [Safe = guard: cf. F. sauvegarde.]

1. One who, or that which, defends or protects; defense; protection.
Shak.
Thy sword, the safeguard of thy brother's throne. Granwille.

2. A convoy or guard to protect a traveler or property.

3. A pass; a passport; a safe-conduct. Shak.

SAFEGUARD
Safe"guard`, v. t.

Defn: To guard; to protect. Shak.

SAFE-KEEPING
Safe"-keep"ing, n. Etym: [Safe + keep.]

Defn: The act of keeping or preserving in safety from injury or from
escape; care; custody.

SAFELY
Safe"ly, adv.

Defn: In a safe manner; danger, injury, loss, or evil consequences.

SAFENESS
Safe"ness, n.

Defn: The quality or state of being safe; freedom from hazard,
danger, harm, or loss; safety; security; as the safeness of an
experiment, of a journey, or of a possession.

SAFE-PLEDGE
Safe"-pledge", n. (Law)

Defn: A surety for the appearance of a person at a given time.
Bracton.

SAFETY
Safe"ty, n. Etym: [Cf. F. sauveté.]

1. The condition or state of being safe; freedom from danger or
hazard; exemption from hurt, injury, or loss.
Up led by thee, Into the heaven I have presumed, An earthly guest . .
. With like safety guided down, Return me to my native element.
Milton.

2. Freedom from whatever exposes one to danger or from libility to
cause danger or harm; safeness; hence, the quality of making safe or
secure, or of giving confidence, justifying trust, insuring against
harm or loss, etc.
Would there were any safety in thy sex, That I might put a thousand
sorrows off. Beau. & Fl.

3. Preservation from escape; close custody.
Imprison him, . . . Deliver him to safety; and return. Shak.

4. (Football)

Defn: Same as Safety touchdown, below. Safety arch (Arch.), a
discharging arch. See under Discharge, v. t.
 -- Safety belt, a belt made of some buoyant material, or which is
capable of being inflated, so as to enable a person to float in
water; a life preserver.
 -- Safety buoy, a buoy to enable a person to float in water; a
safety belt.
 -- Safety cage (Mach.), a cage for an elevator or mine lift, having
appliances to prevent it from dropping if the lifting rope should
break.
 -- Safety lamp. (Mining) See under Lamp.
 -- Safety match, a match which can be ignited only on a surface
specially prepared for the purpose.
 -- Safety pin, a pin made in the form of a clasp, with a guard
covering its point so that it will not prick the wearer.
 -- safety plug. See Fusible plug, under Fusible.
 -- Safety switch. See Switch.
 -- Safety touchdown (Football), the act or result of a player's
touching to the ground behind his own goal line a ball which received
its last impulse from a man on his own side; -- distinguished from
touchback. See Touchdown.
 -- Safety tube (Chem.), a tube to prevent explosion, or to control
delivery of gases by an automatic valvular connection with the outer
air; especially, a bent funnel tube with bulbs for adding those
reagents which produce unpleasant fumes or violent effervescence.
 -- Safety valve, a valve which is held shut by a spring or weight
and opens automatically to permit the escape of steam, or confined
gas, water, etc., from a boiler, or other vessel, when the pressure
becomes too great for safety; also, sometimes, a similar valve
opening inward to admit air to a vessel in which the pressure is less
than that of the atmosphere, to prevent collapse.

SAFETY BICYCLE
Safety bicycle.

Defn: A bicycle with equal or nearly equal wheels, usually 28 inches
diameter, driven by pedals connected to the rear (driving) wheel by a
multiplying gear.

SAFETY CHAIN
Safety chain.
 (a) (Railroads) A normally slack chain for preventing excessive
movement between a truck and a car body in sluing.
 (b) An auxiliary watch chain, secured to the clothes, usually out of
sight, to prevent stealing of the watch.
 (c) A chain of sheet metal links with an elongated hole through each
broad end, made up by doubling the first link on itself, slipping the
next link through and doubling, and so on.

SAFFLOW
Saf"flow, n. (Bot.)

Defn: The safflower. [Obs.]

SAFFLOWER
Saf"flow`er, n. Etym: [F. safeur, safior, for safran, influenced by
fleur flower. See Saffron, and Flower.]

1. (Bot.)

Defn: An annual composite plant (Carthamus tinctorius), the flowers
of which are used as a dyestuff and in making rouge; bastard, or
false, saffron.

2. The died flowers of the Carthamus tinctorius.

3. A dyestuff from these flowers. See Safranin (b). Oil of safflower,
a purgative oil expressed from the seeds of the safflower.

SAFFRON
Saf"fron, n. Etym: [OE. saffran, F. safran; cf. It. zafferano, Sp.
azafran, Pg. açafrao; all fr. Ar. & Per. za' faran.]

1. (Bot.)

Defn: A bulbous iridaceous plant (Crocus sativus) having blue flowers
with large yellow stigmas. See Crocus.

2. The aromatic, pungent, dried stigmas, usually with part of the
stile, of the Crocus sativus. Saffron is used in cookery, and in
coloring confectionery, liquors, varnishes, etc., and was formerly
much used in medicine.

3. An orange or deep yellow color, like that of the stigmas of the
Crocus sativus. Bastard saffron, Dyer's saffron. (Bot.) See
Safflower.
 -- Meadow saffron (Bot.), a bulbous plant (Colchichum autumnate) of
Europe, resembling saffron.
 -- Saffron wood (Bot.), the yellowish wood of a South African tree
(Elæodendron croceum); also, the tree itself.
 -- Saffron yellow, a shade of yellow like that obtained from the
stigmas of the true saffron (Crocus sativus).

SAFFRON
Saf"fron, a.

Defn: Having the color of the stigmas of saffron flowers; deep
orange-yellow; as, a saffron face; a saffron streamer.

SAFFRON
Saf"fron, v. t.

Defn: To give color and flavor to, as by means of saffron; to spice.
[Obs.]
And in Latyn I speak a wordes few, To saffron with my predication.
Chaucer.

SAFFRONY
Saf"fron*y, a.

Defn: Having a color somewhat like saffron; yellowish. Lord (1630).

SAFRANIN
Saf"ra*nin, n. (Chem.)
(a) An orange-red dyestuff extracted from the saffron. [R.]
(b) A red dyestuff extracted from the safflower, and formerly used in
dyeing wool, silk, and cotton pink and scarlet; -- called also
Spanish red, China lake, and carthamin.
(c) An orange-red dyestuff prepared from certain nitro compounds of
creosol, and used as a substitute for the safflower dye.

SAFRANINE
Saf"ra*nine ( or ), n. Etym: [So called because used as a substitute
for safranin.] (Chem.)

Defn: An orange-red nitrogenous dyestuff produced artificailly by
oxidizing certain aniline derivatives, and used in dyeing silk and
wool; also, any one of the series of which safranine proper is the
type.

SAG
Sag, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Sagged; p. pr. & vb. n. Sagging.] Etym:
[Akin to Sw. sacka to settle, sink down, LG.sacken, D. zakken. Cf.
Sink, v. i.]

1. To sink, in the middle, by its weight or under applied pressure,
below a horizontal line or plane; as, a line or cable supported by
its ends sags, though tightly drawn; the floor of a room sags; hence,
to lean, give way, or settle from a vertical position; as, a building
may sag one way or another; a door sags on its hinges.

2. Fig.: To lose firmness or elasticity; to sink; to droop; to flag;
to bend; to yield, as the mind or spirits, under the pressure of
care, trouble, doubt, or the like; to be unsettled or unbalanced.
[R.]
the mind I sway by, and the heart I bear, Shall never sag with doubt
nor shake with fear. Shak.

3. To loiter in walking; to idle along; to drag or droop heavily. To
sag to leeward (Naut.), to make much leeway by reason of the wind,
sea, or current; to drift to leeward; -- said of a vessel. Totten.

SAG
Sag, v. t.

Defn: To cause to bend or give way; to load.

SAG
Sag, n.

Defn: State of sinking or bending; sagging.

SAGA
Sa"ga, n.; pl. Sagas. Etym: [Icel., akin to E. saw a saying. See Say,
and cf. Saw.]

Defn: A Scandinavian legend, or heroic or mythic tradition, among the
Norsemen and kindred people; a northern European popular historical
or religious tale of olden time.
And then the blue-eyed Norseman told A saga of the days of old.
Longfellow.

SAGACIOUS
Sa*ga"cious, a. Etym: [L. sagax, sagacis, akin to sagire to perceive
quickly or keenly, and probably to E. seek. See Seek, and cf.
Presage.]

1. Of quick sense perceptions; keen-scented; skilled in following a
trail.
Sagacious of his quarry from so far. Milton.

2. Hence, of quick intellectual perceptions; of keen penetration and
judgment; discerning and judicious; knowing; far-sighted; shrewd;
sage; wise; as, a sagacious man; a sagacious remark.
Instinct . . . makes them, many times, sagacious above our
apprehension. Dr. H. More.
Only sagacious heads light on these observations, and reduce them
into general propositions. Locke.

Syn.
 -- See Shrewd.
 -- Sa*ga"cious*ly, adv.
 -- Sa-ga"cious*ness, n.

SAGACITY
Sa*gac"i*ty, n. Etym: [L. sagacitas. See Sagacious.]

Defn: The quality of being sagacious; quickness or acuteness of sense
perceptions; keenness of discernment or penetration with soundness of
judgment; shrewdness.
Some [brutes] show that nice sagacity of smell. Cowper.
Natural sagacity improved by generous education. V. Knox.

Syn.
 -- Penetration; shrewdness; judiciousness.
 -- Sagacity, Penetration. Penetration enables us to enter into the
depths of an abstruse subject, to detect motives, plans, etc.
Sagacity adds to penetration a keen, practical judgment, which
enables one to guard against the designs of others, and to turn
everything to the best possible advantage.

SAGAMORE
Sag"a*more, n.

1. Etym: [Cf. Sachem.]

Defn: The head of a tribe among the American Indians; a chief; --
generally used as synonymous with sachem, but some writters
distinguished between them, making the sachem a chief of the first
rank, and a sagamore one of the second rank. "Be it sagamore, sachem,
or powwow." Longfellow.

2. A juice used in medicine. [Obs.] Johnson.

SAGAPEN
Sag"a*pen, n.

Defn: Sagapenum.

SAGAPENUM
Sag`a*pe"num, n. Etym: [L. sagapenon, sacopenium, Gr. sagapin, gomme
sagapin, sagapénum, Ar. sikbinaj, Per. sakbinah, sikbinah.] (Med.)

Defn: A fetid gum resin obtained from a species of Ferula. It has
been used in hysteria, etc., but is now seldom met with. U. S. Disp.

SAGATHY
Sag"a*thy, n. Etym: [F. sagatis: cf. Sp. sagatí, saetí.]

Defn: A mixed woven fabric of silk and cotton; or silk and wool;
sayette; also, a light woolen fabric.

SAGE
Sage, n. Etym: [OE. sauge, F. sauge, L. salvia, from salvus saved, in
allusion to its reputed healing virtues. See Safe.] (Bot.)
(a) A suffriticose labiate plant (Salvia officinalis) with grayish
green foliage, much used in flavoring meats, etc. The name is often
extended to the whole genus, of which many species are cultivated for
ornament, as the scarlet sage, and Mexican red and blue sage.
(b) The sagebrush. Meadow sage (Bot.), a blue-flowered species of
salvia (S. pratensis) growing in meadows in Europe.
 -- Sage cheese, cheese flavored with sage, and colored green by the
juice of leaves of spanish and other plants which are added to the
milk.
 -- Sage cock (Zoöl.), the male of the sage grouse; in a more general
sense, the specific name of the sage grouse.
 -- Sage green, of a dull grayish green color, like the leaves of
garden sage.
 -- Sage grouse (Zoöl.), a very large American grouse (Centrocercus
urophasianus), native of the dry sagebrush plains of Western North
America. Called also cock of the plains. The male is called sage
cock, and the female sage hen.
 -- Sage hare, or Sage rabbit (Zoöl.), a species of hare (Lepus
Nuttalli, or artemisia) which inhabits the regions of Western North
America and lives among sagebrush. By recent writers it is considered
to be merely a variety of the common cottontail, or wood rabbit.
 -- Sage hen (Zoöl.), the female of the sage grouse. Sage sparrow
(Zoöl.), a small sparrow (Amphispiza Belli, var Nevadensis) which
inhabits the dry plains of the Rocky Mountain region, living among
sagebrush.
 -- Sage thrasher (Zoöl.), a singing bird (Oroscoptes montanus) which
inhabits the sagebrush plains of Western North America.
 -- Sage willow (Bot.), a species of willow (Salix tristis) forming a
low bush with nearly sessile grayish green leaves.

SAGE
Sage, a. [Compar. Sager; superl. Sagest.] Etym: [F., fr. L. sapius
(only in nesapius unwise, foolish), fr. sapere to be wise; perhaps
akin to E. sap. Cf. Savor, Sapient, Insipid.]

1. Having nice discernment and powers of judging; prudent; grave;
sagacious.
All you sage counselors, hence! Shak.

2. Proceeding from wisdom; well judged; shrewd; well adapted to the
purpose.
Commanders, who, cloaking their fear under show of sage advice,
counseled the general to retreat. Milton.

3. Grave; serious; solemn. [R.] "[Great bards.] in sage and solemn
tunes have sung." Milton.

Syn.
 -- Wise; sagacious; sapient; grave; prudent; judicious.

SAGE
Sage, n.

Defn: A wise man; a man of gravity and wisdom; especially, a man
venerable for years, and of sound judgment and prudence; a grave
philosopher.
At his birth a star, Unseen before in heaven, proclaims him come, And
guides the Eastern sages. Milton.

SAGEBRUSH
Sage"brush`, n.

Defn: A low irregular shrub (Artemisia tridentata), of the order
Compositæ, covering vast tracts of the dry alkaline regions of the
American plains; -- called also sagebush, and wild sage.

SAGEBRUSH STATE
Sagebrush State.

Defn: Nevada; -- a nickname.

SAGELY
Sage"ly, adv.

Defn: In a sage manner; wisely.

SAGENE
Sa*gene", n. Etym: [Russ. sajene.]

Defn: A Russian measure of length equal to about seven English feet.

SAGENESS
Sage"ness, n.

Defn: The quality or state of being sage; wisdom; sagacity; prudence;
gravity. Ascham.

SAGENITE
Sag"e*nite, n. Etym: [F. sagénite, fr. L. sagena a large net. See
Saine.] (Min.)

Defn: Acicular rutile occurring in reticulated forms imbedded in
quartz.

SAGENITIC
Sag`e*nit"ic, a. (Min.)

Defn: Resembling sagenite; -- applied to quartz when containing
acicular crystals of other minerals, most commonly rutile, also
tourmaline, actinolite, and the like.

SAGGER
Sag"ger, n. Etym: [See Segger.]

1. A pot or case of fire clay, in which fine stoneware is inclosed
while baking in the kiln; a segga.

2. The clay of which such pots or cases are made.

SAGGING
Sag"ging, n.

Defn: A bending or sinking between the ends of a thing, in
consequence of its own, or an imposed, weight; an arching downward in
the middle, as of a ship after straining. Cf. Hogging.

SAGINATE
Sag"i*nate, v. t. Etym: [L. saginatus, p.p. of saginare to fat, fr.
sagina stuffing.]

Defn: To make fat; to pamper. [R.] "Many a saginated boar." Cowper.

SAGINATION
Sag`i*na"tion, n. Etym: [L. saginatio.]

Defn: The act of fettening or pampering. [R.] Topsell.

SAGITTA
Sa*git"ta, n. Etym: [L., an arrow.]

1. (Astron.)

Defn: A small constellation north of Aquila; the Arrow.

2. (Arch.)

Defn: The keystone of an arch. [R.] gwitt.

3. (Geom.)

Defn: The distance from a point in a curve to the chord; also, the
versed sine of an arc; -- so called from its resemblance to an arrow
resting on the bow and string. [Obs.]

4. (Anat.)

Defn: The larger of the two otoliths, or ear bones, found in most
fishes.

5. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A genus of transparent, free-swimming marine worms having
lateral and caudal fins, and capable of swimming rapidly. It is the
type of the class Chætognatha.

SAGITTAL
Sag"it*tal, a. Etym: [L. sagitta an arrow: cf. F. saguttal.]

1. Of or pertaining to an arrow; resembling an arrow; furnished with
an arowlike appendage.

2. (Anat.)
(a) Of or pertaining to the sagittal suture; in the region of the
sagittal suture; rabdoidal; as, the sagittal furrow, or groove, on
the inner surface of the roof of the skull.
(b) In the mesial plane; as, a sagittal section of an animal.
Sagittal suture (Anat.), the suture between the two parietal bones in
the top of the skull; -- called also rabdoidal suture, and
interparietal suture.

SAGITTARIUS
Sag`it*ta"ri*us, n. Etym: [L., literally, an archer, fr. sagittarius
belonging to an arrow, fr. sagitta an arrow.] (Astron.)
(a) The ninth of the twelve signs of the zodiac, which the sun enters
about November 22, marked thus [&sagittarius;] in almanacs; the
Archer.
(b) A zodiacal constellation, represented on maps and globes as a
centaur shooting an arrow.

SAGITTARY
Sag"it*ta"ry, n. Etym: [See Sagittarius.]

1. (Myth.)

Defn: A centaur; a fabulous being, half man, half horse, armed with a
bow and quiver. Shak.

2. The Arsenal in Venice; -- so called from having a figure of an
archer over the door. Shak.

SAGITTARY
Sag"it*ta*ry, a. Etym: [L. sagittarius.]

Defn: Pertaining to, or resembling, an arrow. Sir T. Browne.

SAGITTATE
Sag"it*tate, a. Etym: [NL. sagittatus, fr. L. sagitta an arrow.]

Defn: Shaped like an arrowhead; triangular, with the two basal angles
prolonged downward.

SAGITTATED
Sag"it*ta`ted, a.

Defn: Sagittal; sagittate.

SAGITTOCYST
Sag"it*to*cyst, n. Etym: [See Sagitta, and Cyst.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A defensive cell containing a minute rodlike structure which
may be expelled. Such cells are found in certain Turbellaria.

SAGO
Sa"go, n. Etym: [Malay. sagu.]

Defn: A dry granulated starch imported from the East Indies, much
used for making puddings and as an article of diet for the sick;
also, as starch, for stiffening textile fabrics. It is prepared from
the stems of several East Indian and Malayan palm trees, but chiefly
from the Metroxylon Sagu; also from several cycadaceous plants (Cycas
revoluta, Zamia integrifolia, atc.). Portland sago, a kind of sago
prepared from the corms of the cuckoopint (Arum maculatum).
 -- Sago palm. (Bot.) (a) A palm tree which yields sago. (b) A
species of Cycas (Cycas revoluta).
 -- Sago spleen (Med.), a morbid condition of the spleen, produced by
amyloid degeneration of the organ, in which a cross section shows
scattered gray translucent bodies looking like grains of sago.

SAGOIN
Sa*goin", n. Etym: [F. sagouin(formed from the native South American
name).] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A marmoset; -- called also sagouin.

SAGUM
Sa"gum, n.; pl. Saga. Etym: [L. sagum, sagus; cf. Gr. Say a kind of
serge.] (Rom. Antiq.)

Defn: The military cloak of the Roman soldiers.

SAGUS
sa"gus, n. Etym: [NL. See Sago.] (Bot.)

Defn: A genus of palms from which sago is obtained.

SAGY
Sa"gy, a.

Defn: Full of sage; seasoned with sage.

SAHIB; SAHEB
Sa"hib, sa"heb, n. Etym: [Ar. çahib master, lord, fem. çahibah.]

Defn: A respectful title or appelation given to Europeans of rank.
[India]

SAHIBAH
Sa"hi*bah, n. Etym: [See Sahib.]

Defn: A lady; mistress. [India]

SAHIDIC
Sa*hid"ic, a.

Defn: Same as Thebaic.

SAHLITE
Sah"lite, n. (Min.)

Defn: See Salite.

SAHUI
Sa*hui", n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A marmoset.

SAI
Sa"i, n. Etym: [Cf. Pg. sahi.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: See Capuchin, 3 (a).

SAIBLING
Sai"bling, n. Etym: [Dial. G.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A European mountain trout (Salvelinus alpinus); -- called also
Bavarian charr.

SAIC
Sa"ic, n. Etym: [F. saïque, turk. shaïka.] (Naut.)

Defn: A kind of ketch very common in the Levant, which has neither
topgallant sail nor mizzen topsail.

SAID
Said,

Defn: imp. & p. p. of Say.

SAID
Said, a.

Defn: before-mentioned; already spoken of or specified; aforesaid; --
used chiefly in legal style.

SAIGA
Sai"ga, n. Etym: [Russ. saika.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: An antelope (Saiga Tartarica) native of the plains of Siberia
and Eastern Russia. The male has erect annulated horns, and tufts of
long hair beneath the eyes and ears.

SAIKYR
Sai"kyr, n. (Mil.)

Defn: Same as Saker. [Obs.]

SAIL
Sail, n. Etym: [OE. seil, AS. segel, segl; akin to D. zeil, OHG.
segal, G. & Sw. segel, Icel. segl, Dan. seil. sq. root 153.]

1. An extent of canvas or other fabric by means of which the wind is
made serviceable as a power for propelling vessels through the water.
Behoves him now both sail and oar. Milton.

2. Anything resembling a sail, or regarded as a sail.

3. A wing; a van. [Poetic]
Like an eagle soaring To weather his broad sails. Spenser
.

4. the extended surface of the arm of a windmill.

5. A sailing vessel; a vessel of any kind; a craft.

Note: In this sense, the plural has usually the same forms as the
singular; as, twenty sail were in sight.

6. A passage by a sailing vessel; a journey or excursion upon the
water.

Note: Sails are of two general kinds, fore-and-aft sails, and square
sails. Square sails are always bent to yards, with their foot lying
across the line of the vessel. Fore-and-aft sails are set upon stays
or gaffs with their foot in line with the keel. A fore-and-aft sail
is triangular, or quadrilateral with the after leech longer than the
fore leech. Square sails are quardrilateral, but not necessarily
square. See Phrases under Fore, a., and Square, a.; also, Bark, Brig,
Schooner, Ship, Stay. Sail burton (Naut.), a purchase for hoisting
sails aloft for bending.
 -- Sail fluke (Zoöl.), the whiff.
 -- Sail hook, a small hook used in making sails, to hold the seams
square.
 -- Sail loft, a loft or room where sails are cut out and made.
 -- Sail room (Naut.), a room in a vessel where sails are stowed when
not in use.
 -- Sail yard (Naut.), the yard or spar on which a sail is extended.
 -- Shoulder-of-mutton sail (Naut.), a triangular sail of peculiar
form. It is chiefly used to set on a boat's mast.
 -- To crowd sail. (Naut.) See under Crowd.
 -- To loose sails (Naut.), to unfurl or spread sails.
 -- To make sail (Naut.), to extend an additional quantity of sail.
 -- To set a sail (Naut.), to extend or spread a sail to the wind.
 -- To set sail (Naut.), to unfurl or spread the sails; hence, to
begin a voyage.
 -- To shorten sail (Naut.), to reduce the extent of sail, or take in
a part.
 -- To strike sail (Naut.), to lower the sails suddenly, as in
saluting, or in sudden gusts of wind; hence, to acknowledge
inferiority; to abate pretension.
 -- Under sail, having the sails spread.

SAIL
Sail, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Sailed; p. pr. & vb. n. Sailing.] Etym:
[AS. segelian, seglian. See Sail, n.]

1. To be impelled or driven forward by the action of wind upon sails,
as a ship on water; to be impelled on a body of water by the action
of steam or other power.

2. To move through or on the water; to swim, as a fish or a water
fowl.

3. To be conveyed in a vessel on water; to pass by water; as, they
sailed from London to Canton.

4. To set sail; to begin a voyage.

5. To move smoothly through the air; to glide through the air without
apparent exertion, as a bird.
As is a winged messenger of heaven, . . . When he bestrides the lazy
pacing clouds, And sails upon the bosom of the air. Shak.

SAIL
Sail, v. t.

1. To pass or move upon, as in a ship, by means of sails; hence, to
move or journey upon(the water) by means of steam or other force.
A thousand ships were manned to sail the sea. Dryden.

2. To fly through; to glide or move smoothly through.
Sublime she sails The aërial space, and mounts the winged gales.
Pope.

3. To direct or manage the motion of, as a vessel; as, to sail one's
own ship. Totten.

SAILABLE
Sail"a*ble, a.

Defn: Capable of being sailed over; navigable; as, a sailable river.

SAILBOAT
Sail"boat`, n.

Defn: A boat propelled by a sail or sails.

SAILCLOTH
Sail"cloth`, n.

Defn: Duck or canvas used in making sails.

SAILER
Sail"er, n.

1. A sailor. [R.] Sir P. Sidney.

2. A ship or other vessel; -- with qualifying words descriptive of
speed or manner of sailing; as, a heavy sailer; a fast sailer.

SAILFISH
Sail"fish, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) The banner fish, or spikefish (Histiophorus.)
(b) The basking, or liver, shark.
(c) The quillback.

SAILING
Sail"ing, n.

1. The act of one who, or that which, sails; the motion of a vessel
on water, impelled by wind or steam; the act of starting on a voyage.

2. (Naut.)

Defn: The art of managing a vessel; seamanship; navigation; as,
globular sailing; oblique sailing.

Note: For the several methods of sailing, see under Circular,
Globular, Oblique, Parallel, etc. Sailing master (U. S. Navy),
formerly, a warrant officer, ranking next below a lieutenant, whose
duties were to navigate the vessel; and under the direction of the
executive officer, to attend to the stowage of the hold, to the
cables, rigging, etc. The grade was merged in that of master in 1862.

SAILLESS
Sail"less, a.

Defn: Destitute of sails. Pollok.

SAILMAKER
Sail"mak`er, n.

Defn: One whose occupation is to make or repair sails.
 -- Sail"mak`ing, n.

SAILOR
Sail"or, n.

Defn: One who follows the business of navigating ships or other
vessels; one who understands the practical management of ships; one
of the crew of a vessel; a mariner; a common seaman.

Syn.
 -- Mariner; seaman; seafarer. Sailor's choice. (Zoöl.) (a) An
excellent marine food fish (Diplodus, or Lagodon, rhomboides) of the
Southern United States; -- called also porgy, squirrel fish,
yellowtail, and salt-water bream. (b) A species of grunt
(Orthopristis, or Pomadasys, chrysopterus), an excellent food fish,
common on the southern coasts of the United States; -- called also
hogfish, and pigfish.

SAILY
Sail"y, a.

Defn: Like a sail. [R.] Drayton.

SAIM
Saim, n. Etym: [OF. sain, LL. saginum, fr. L. sagina a fattening.]

Defn: Lard; grease. [Scot. & Prov. Eng.]

SAIMIR
Sai*mir", n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The squirrel monkey.

SAIN
Sain, obs. p. p. of Say, for sayen.

Defn: Said. Shak.

SAIN
Sain, v. t. Etym: [Cf. Saint, Sane.]

Defn: To sanctify; to bless so as to protect from evil influence.
[R.] Sir W. Scott.

SAINFOIN
Sain"foin, n. Etym: [F., fr. sain wholesome (L. sanus; see Sane.) +
foin hay (L. fænum); or perh. fr. saint sacred (L. sanctus; see
Saint) + foin hay.] (Bot.)
(a) A leguminous plant (Onobrychis sativa) cultivated for fodder.
[Written also saintfoin.]
(b) A kind of tick trefoil (Desmodium Canadense). [Canada]

SAINT
Saint, n. Etym: [F., fr. L. santcus sacred, properly p.p. of sancire
to render sacred by a religious act, to appoint as sacred; akin to
sacer sacred. Cf. Sacred, Sanctity, Sanctum, Sanctus.]

1. A person sanctified; a holy or godly person; one eminent for piety
and virtue; any true Christian, as being redeemed and consecrated to
God.
Them that are sanctified in Christ Jesus, called to be saints. 1 Cor.
i. 2.

2. One of the blessed in heaven.
Then shall thy saints, unmixed, and from the impure Far separate,
circling thy holy mount, Unfeigned hallelujahs to thee sing. Milton.

3. (Eccl.)

Defn: One canonized by the church. [Abbrev. St.] Saint Andrew's cross
(a) A cross shaped like the letter X. See Illust. 4, under Cross. (b)
(Bot.) A low North American shrub (Ascyrum Crux-Andræ, the petals of
which have the form of a Saint Andrew's cross. Gray.
 -- Saint Anthony's cross, a T-shaped cross. See Illust. 6, under
Cross.
 -- Saint Anthony's fire, the erysipelas; -- popularly so called
because it was supposed to have been cured by the intercession of
Saint Anthony.
 -- Saint Anthony's nut (Bot.), the groundnut (Bunium flexuosum); --
so called because swine feed on it, and St. Anthony was once a
swineherd. Dr. Prior.
 -- Saint Anthony's turnip (Bot.), the bulbous crowfoot, a favorite
food of swine. Dr. Prior.
 -- Saint Barnaby's thistle (Bot.), a kind of knapeweed (Centaurea
solstitialis) flowering on St. Barnabas's Day, June 11th. Dr. Prior.
 -- Saint Bernard (Zoöl.), a breed of large, handsome dogs celebrated
for strength and sagacity, formerly bred chiefly at the Hospice of
St. Bernard in Switzerland, but now common in Europe and America.
There are two races, the smooth-haired and the rough-haired. See
Illust. under Dog.
 -- Saint Catharine's flower (Bot.), the plant love-a-mist. See under
Love.
 -- Saint Cuthbert's beads (Paleon.), the fossil joints of crinoid
stems.
 -- Saint Dabeoc's heath (Bot.), a heatherlike plant (Dabæcia
polifolia), named from an Irish saint.
 -- Saint Distaff's Day. See under Distaff.
 -- Saint Elmo's fire, a luminious, flamelike appearance, sometimes
seen in dark, tempestuous nights, at some prominent point on a ship,
particularly at the masthead and the yardams. It has also been
observed on land, and is due to the discharge of electricity from
elevated or pointed objects. A single flame is called a Helena, or a
Corposant; a double, or twin, flame is called a Castor and Pollux, or
a double Corposant. It takes its name from St. Elmo, the patron saint
of sailors.
 -- Saint George's cross (Her.), a Greek cross gules upon a field
argent, the field being represented by a narrow fimbriation in the
ensign, or union jack, of Great Britain.
 -- Saint George's ensign, a red cross on a white field with a union
jack in the upper corner next the mast. It is the distinguishing
badge of ships of the royal navy of England; -- called also the white
ensign. Brande & C.
 -- Saint George's flag, a smaller flag resembling the ensign, but
without the union jack; used as the sign of the presence and command
of an admiral. [Eng.] Brande & C.
 -- Saint Gobain glass (Chem.), a fine variety of soda-lime plate
glass, so called from St.Gobain in France, where it was manufactured.
 -- Saint Ignatius's bean (Bot.), the seed of a tree of the
Philippines (Strychnos Ignatia), of properties similar to the nux
vomica.
 -- Saint Jame's shell (Zoöl.), a pecten (Vola Jacobæus) worn by
piligrims to the Holy Land. See Illust. under Scallop.
 -- Saint Jame's wort (Bot.), a kind of ragwort (Senecio Jacobæa).
 -- Saint John's bread. (Bot.) See Carob.
 -- Saint John's-wort (Bot.), any plant of the genus Hypericum, most
species of which have yellow flowers; -- called also John's-wort.
 -- Saint Leger, the name of a race for three-year-old horses run
annually in September at Doncaster, England; -- instituted in 1776 by
Col. St. Leger.
 -- Saint Martin's herb (Bot.), a small tropical American violaceous
plant (Sauvagesia erecta). It is very mucilaginous and is used in
medicine.

-- Saint Martin's summer, a season of mild, damp weather frequently
prevailing during late autumn in England and the Mediterranean
countries; -- so called from St. Martin's Festival, occuring on
November 11. It corresponds to the Indian summer in America. Shak.
Whitier.
 -- Saint Patrick's cross. See Illust 4, under Cross.
 -- Saint Patrick's Day, the 17th of March, anniversary of the death
(about 466) of St. Patrick, the apostle and patron saint of Ireland.
 -- Saint Peter's fish. (Zoöl.) See John Dory, under John.
 -- Saint Peter's-wort (Bot.), a name of several plants, as Hypericum
Ascyron, H. quadrangulum, Ascyrum stans, etc.
 -- Saint Peter's wreath (Bot.), a shrubby kind of Spiræa (S.
hypericifolia), having long slender branches covered with clusters of
small white blossoms in spring.
 -- Saint's bell. See Sanctus bell, under Sanctus.
 -- Saint Vitus's dance (Med.), chorea; -- so called from the
supposed cures wrought on intercession to this saint.

SAINT
Saint, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Sainted; p. pr. & vb. n. Sainting.]

Defn: To make a saint of; to enroll among the saints by an offical
act, as of the pope; to canonize; to give the title or reputation of
a saint to (some one).
A large hospital, erected by a shoemaker who has been beatified,
though never sainted. Addison.
To saint it, to act as a saint, or with a show of piety.
Whether the charmer sinner it or saint it. Shak.

SAINT
Saint, v. i.

Defn: To act or live as a saint. [R.] Shak.

SAINTDOM
Saint"dom, n.

Defn: The state or character of a saint. [R.] Tennyson.

SAINTED
Saint"ed, a.

1. Consecrated; sacred; holy; pious. "A most sainted king." Shak.
Amongst the enthroned gods on sainted seats. Milton.

2. Entered into heaven; -- a euphemism for dead.

SAINTESS
Saint"ess, n.

Defn: A female saint. [R.] Bp. Fisher.

SAINTHOOD
Saint"hood, n.

1. The state of being a saint; the condition of a saint. Walpole.

2. The order, or united body, of saints; saints, considered
collectively.
It was supposed he felt no call to anu expedition that might
sainthood. Sir W. Scott.

SAINTISH
Saint"ish, a.

Defn: Somewhat saintlike; -- used ironically.

SAINTISM
Saint"ism, n.

Defn: The character or quality of saints; also, hypocritical pretense
of holiness. Wood.

SAINTLIKE
Saint"like`, a.

Defn: Resembling a saint; suiting a saint; becoming a saint; saintly.
Glossed over only with a saintlike show. Dryden.

SAINTLINESS
Saint"li*ness, n.

Defn: Quality of being saintly.

SAINTLY
Saint"ly, a. [Compar. Saintlier; superl. Saintliest.]

Defn: Like a saint; becoming a holy person.
So dear to Heaven is saintly chastity. Milton.

SAINTOLOGIST
Saint*ol"o*gist, n. Etym: [Saint + -logy + -ist.] (Theol.)

Defn: One who writes the lives of saints. [R.]

SAINTSHIP
Saint"ship, n.

Defn: The character or qualities of a saint.

SAINT-SIMONIAN
Saint`-Si*mo"ni*an, n.

Defn: A follower of the Count de St. Simon, who died in 1825, and who
maintained that the principle of property held in common, and the
just division of the fruits of common labor among the members of
society, are the true remedy for the social evils which exist. Brande
& C.

SAINT-SIMONIANISM
Saint`-Si*mo"ni*an*ism, n.

Defn: The principles, doctrines, or practice of the Saint-Simonians;
-- called also Saint-Simonism.

SAINT-SIMONISM
Saint-Si"mon*ism, n.

Defn: A system of socialism in which the state owns all the property
and the laborer is entitled to share according to the quality and
amount of his work, founded by Saint Simon (1760-1825).

SAITH
Saith,

Defn: 3d pers. sing. pres. of Say. [Archaic]

SAITHE
Saithe, n. Etym: [Gael. saoidheam.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: The pollock, or coalfish; -- called also sillock. [Scot.]

SAIVA
Sai"va ( or ), n. Etym: [Skr. çaiva devoted to Siva.]

Defn: One of an important religious sect in India which regards Siva
with peculiar veneration.

SAIVISM
Sai"vism, n.

Defn: The worship of Siva.

SAJENE
Sa*jene", n.

Defn: Same as Sagene.

SAJOU
Sa"jou (; F. , n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Same as Sapajou.

SAKE
Sake, n. Etym: [OE. sake cause, also, lawsuit, fault, AS. sacu
strife, a cause or suit at law; akin to D. zaak cause, thing, affair,
G. sache thing, cause in law, OHG. sahha, Icel. sök, Sw. sak, Dan.
sag, Goth. sakj strife, AS. sacan to contend, strive, Goth. sakan,
Icel. saka to contend, strive, blame, OHG. sahhan, MHG. sachen, to
contend, strive, defend one's right, accuse, charge in a lawsuit, and
also to E. seek. Cf. Seek.]

Defn: Final cause; end; purpose of obtaining; cause; motive; reason;
interest; concern; account; regard or respect; -- used chiefly in
such phrases as, for the sake, for his sake, for man's sake, for
mercy's sake, and the like; as, to commit crime for the sake of gain;
to go abroad for the sake of one's health.
Moved with wrath and shame and ladies; sake. Spenser.
I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake. Gen. viii.
21.
Will he draw out, For anger's sake, finite to infinite Milton.
Knowledge is for the sake of man, and not man for the sake of
knowledge. Sir W. Hamilton.

Note: The -s of the possessive case preceding sake is sometimes
omitted for euphony; as, for goodness sake. "For conscience sake." 1
Cor. x. 28. The plural sakes is often used with a possessive plural.
"For both our sakes." Shak.

SAKER
Sa"ker, n. Etym: [F. sacre (cf. It. sagro, Sp. & Pg. sacre), either
fr. L. sacer sacred, holy, as a translation of Gr. hawk.] [Written
also sacar, sacre.]

1. (Zo\'94l.)
(a) A falcon (Falco sacer) native of Southern Europe and Asia,
closely resembling the lanner.

Note: The female is called chargh, and the male charghela, or
sakeret.
(b) The peregrine falcon. [Prov. Eng.]

2. (Mil.)

Defn: A small piece of artillery. Wilhelm.
On the bastions were planted culverins and sakers. Macaulay.
The culverins and sakers showing their deadly muzzles over the
rampart. Hawthorne.

SAKERET
Sa"ker*et, n. Etym: [F. sacret. See Saker.] (Zo\'94l.)

Defn: The male of the saker (a).

SAKI
Sa"ki, n. Etym: [Cf. F. & Pg. saki; probably from the native name.]
(Zo\'94l.)

Defn: Any one of several species of South American monkeys of the
genus Pithecia. They have large ears, and a long hairy tail which is
not prehensile.

Note: The black saki (Pithecia satanas), the white-headed
(P.leucocephala), and the red-backed, or hand-drinking, saki
(P.chiropotes), are among the best-known.

SAKI
Sa"ki, n.

Defn: The alcoholic drink of Japan. It is made from rice.sake

SAKIEH; SAKIYEH
Sak"i*eh, Sak"i*yeh, n. [Ar. saqiah canal, trench.]

Defn: A kind of water wheel used in Egypt for raising water, from
wells or pits, in buckets attached to its periphery or to an endless
rope.

SAKTI
Sak"ti, n. Etym: [Skr.] (Hind. Myth.)

Defn: The divine energy, personified as the wife of a deity (Brahma,
Vishnu, Siva, etc.); the female principle.

SAL
Sal (sall), n. Etym: [Hind. s\'bel, Skr. ç\'bela.] (Bot.)

Defn: An East Indian timber tree (Shorea robusta), much used for
building purposes. It is of a light brown color, close-grained, and
durable. [Written also saul.]

SAL
Sal (sâl), n. Etym: [L. See Salt.] (Chem. & Pharm.)

Defn: Salt. Sal absinthii Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), an impure
potassium carbonate obtained from the ashes of wormwood (Artemisia
Absinthium).
 -- Sal acetosell\'91 Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), salt of sorrel.
 -- Sal alembroth. (Old Chem.) See Alembroth.
 -- Sal ammoniac (Chem.), ammonium chloride, NH4Cl, a white
crystalline volatile substance having a sharp salty taste, obtained
from gas works, from nitrogenous matter, etc. It is largely employed
as a source of ammonia, as a reagent, and as an expectorant in
bronchitis. So called because originally made from the soot from
camel's dung at the temple of Jupiter Ammon in Africa. Called also
muriate of ammonia.
 -- Sal catharticus Etym: [NL.] (Old Med. Chem.), Epsom salts.
 -- Sal culinarius Etym: [L.] (Old Chem.), common salt, or sodium
chloride.
 -- Sal Cyrenaicus. Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.) See Sal ammoniac above.
 -- Sal de duobus, Sal duplicatum Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), potassium
sulphate; -- so called because erroneously supposed to be composed of
two salts, one acid and one alkaline.
 -- Sal diureticus Etym: [NL.] (Old Med. Chem.), potassium acetate.
 -- Sal enixum Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), acid potassium sulphate.
 -- Sal gemm\'91 Etym: [NL.] (Old Min.), common salt occuring native.
 -- Sal Jovis Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), salt tin, or stannic chloride;
-- the alchemical name of tin being Jove.
 -- Sal Martis Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), green vitriol, or ferrous
sulphate; -- the alchemical name of iron being. Mars.
 -- Sal microcosmicum Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.) See Microcosmic salt,
under Microcosmic.
 -- Sal plumbi Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), sugar of lead.
 -- Sal prunella. (Old Chem.) See Prunella salt, under 1st Prunella.
 -- Sal Saturni Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), sugar of lead, or lead
acetate; -- the alchemical name of lead being Saturn.
 -- Sal sedativus Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), sedative salt, or boric
acid.
 -- Sal Seignette Etym: [F. seignette, sel de seignette] (Chem.),
Rochelle salt.
 -- Sal soda (Chem.), sodium carbonate. See under Sodium.
 -- Sal vitrioli Etym: [NL.] (Old Chem.), white vitriol; zinc
sulphate.
 -- Sal volatile. Etym: [NL.] (a) (Chem.) See Sal ammoniac, above.
(b) Spirits of ammonia.

SALAAM
Sa*laam", n.

Defn: Same as Salam.
Finally, Josiah might have made his salaam to the exciseman just as
he was folding up that letter. Prof. Wilson.

SALAAM
Sa*laam", v. i.

Defn: To make or perform a salam.
I have salaamed and kowtowed to him. H. James.

SALABILITY
Sal`a*bil"i*ty, n.

Defn: The quality or condition of being salable; salableness. Duke of
Argyll.

SALABLE
Sal"a*ble, a. Etym: [From Sale.]

Defn: Capable of being sold; fit to be sold; finding a ready market.
 -- Sal"a*ble*ness, n.
 -- Sal"a*bly, adv.

SALACIOUS
Sa*la"cious, n. Etym: [L. salax, -acis, fond of leaping, lustful, fr.
salire to leap. See Salient.]

Defn: Having a propensity to venery; lustful; lecherous. Dryden.
 -- Sa*la"cious*ly, dv.
 -- Sa*la"cious*ness, n.

SALACITY
Sa*lac"i*ty, n. Etym: [L. salacitas: cf. F. salacité]

Defn: Strong propensity to venery; lust; lecherousness.

SALAD
Sal"ad, n. Etym: [F. salade, OIt. salata, It. insalata, fr. salare to
salt, fr. L. sal salt. See Salt, and cf. Slaw.]

1. A preparation of vegetables, as lettuce, celery, water cress,
onions, etc., usually dressed with salt, vinegar, oil, and spice, and
eaten for giving a relish to other food; as, lettuce salad; tomato
salad, etc.
Leaves eaten raw termed salad. I. Watts.

2. A dish composed of chopped meat or fish, esp. chicken or lobster,
mixed with lettuce or other vegetables, and seasoned with oil,
vinegar, mustard, and other condiments; as, chicken salad; lobster
salad. Salad burnet (Bot.), the common burnet (Poterium Sanguisorba),
sometimes eaten as a salad in Italy.

SALADE
Sal"ade, n.

Defn: A helmet. See Sallet.

SALADING
Sal"ad*ing, n.

Defn: Vegetable for salad.

SALAERATUS
Sal`æ*ra"tus, n.

Defn: See Saleratus.

SALAGANE
Sal"a*gane, n. Etym: [From the Chinese name.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: The esculent swallow. See under Esculent.

SALAL-BERRY
Sal"al-ber`ry, n. Etym: [Probably of American Indian origin.] (Bot.)

Defn: The edible fruit of the Gaultheria Shallon, an ericaceous shrub
found from California northwards. The berries are about the size of a
common grape and of a dark purple color.

SALAM
Sa*lam (sa*läm"), n. Etym: [Ar. salam peace, safety.]

Defn: A salutation or compliment of ceremony in the east by word or
act; an obeisance, performed by bowing very low and placing the right
palm on the forehead. [Written also salaam.]

SALAMANDER
Sal"a*man`der, n. Etym: [F. salamandre, L. salamandra, Gr. samander,
samandel.]

1. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of numerous species of Urodela, belonging to
Salamandra, Amblystoma, Plethodon, and various allied genera,
especially those that are more or less terrestrial in their habits.

Note: The salamanders have, like lizards, an elongated body, four
feet, and a long tail, but are destitute of scales. They are true
Amphibia, related to the frogs. Formerly, it was a superstition that
the salamander could live in fire without harm, and even extinguish
it by the natural coldness of its body.
I have maintained that salamander of yours with fire any time this
two and thirty years. Shak.
Whereas it is commonly said that a salamander extinguisheth fire, we
have found by experience that on hot coals, it dieth immediately. Sir
T. Browne.

2. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The pouched gopher (Geomys tuza) of the Southern United States.

3. A culinary utensil of metal with a plate or disk which is heated,
and held over pastry, etc., to brown it.

4. A large poker. [prov. Eng.] Halliwell.

5. (Metal.)

Defn: Solidofied material in a furnace hearth. Giant salamander.
(Zoöl.) See under Giant.
 -- Salamander's hair or wool (Min.), a species of asbestus or
mineral flax. [Obs.] Bacon.

SALAMANDRINA
Sal`a*man*dri"na, n.; pl. Etym: [NL.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A suborder of Urodela, comprising salamanders.

SALAMANDRINE
Sal`a*man"drine, a.

Defn: Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a salamander; enduring fire.
Addison.

SALAMANDROID
Sal`a*man"droid, a Etym: [Salamander + -oid.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: Like or pertaining to the salamanders.

SALAMANDROIDEA
sal`a*man*droi"de*a, n. pl. Etym: [NL.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A division of Amphibia including the Salamanders and allied
groups; the Urodela.

SALAMSTONE
Sal"am*stone` ( or ), n. (Min.)

Defn: A kind of blue sapphire brought from Ceylon. Dana.

SALANGANA
Sa*lan"ga*na, n.

Defn: The salagane.

SALARIED
Sal"a*ried, a.

Defn: Receiving a salary; paid by a salary; having a salary attached;
as, a salaried officer; a salaried office.

SALARY
Sal"a*ry, a. Etym: [L. salarius.]

Defn: Saline [Obs.]

SALARY
Sal"a*ry, n.; pl. Salaries. Etym: [F. salarie, L. salarium,
originally, salt money, the money given to the Roman soldiers for
salt, which was a part of thir pay, fr. salarius belonging to salt,
fr. sal salt. See Salt.]

Defn: The recompense or consideration paid, or stipulated to be paid,
to a person at regular intervals for services; fixed wages, as by the
year, quarter, or month; stipend; hire.
This is hire and salary, not revenge. Shak.

Note: Recompense for services paid at, or reckoned by, short
intervals, as a day or week, is usually called wages.

Syn.
 -- Stipend; pay; wages; hire; allowance.

SALARY
Sal"a*ry v. t. [imp. & p. p. Salaried; p. pr. & vb. n. Salarying.]

Defn: To pay, or agree to pay, a salary to; to attach salary to; as,
to salary a clerk; to salary a position.

SALE
Sale, n.

Defn: See 1st Sallow. [Obs.] Spenser.

SALE
Sale, n. Etym: [Icel. sala, sal, akin to E.sell. See Sell, v. t.]

1. The act of selling; the transfer of property, or a contract to
transfer the ownership of property, from one person to another for a
valuable consideration, or for a price in money.

2. Opportunity of selling; demand; market.
They shall have ready sale for them. Spenser.

3. Public disposal to the highest bidder, or exposure of goods in
market; auction. Sir W. Temple. Bill of sale. See under Bill.
 -- Of sale, On sale, For sale, to be bought or sold; offered to
purchasers; in the market.
 -- To set to sale, to offer for sale; to put up for purchase; to
make merchandise of. [Obs.] Milton.

SALEABLE; SALEABLY
Sale"a*ble, a., Sale"a*bly, adv., etc.

Defn: See Salable, Salably, etc.

SALEB
Sal"eb, n. (Med.)

Defn: See Salep.

SALEBROSITY
Sal`e*bros"i*ty, n.

Defn: Roughness or ruggedness. [Obs.] Feltham.

SALEBROUS
Sal"e*brous, a. Etym: [L. salebosus, fr. salebra a rugged road, fr.
salire to leap.]

Defn: Rough; rugged. [Obs.]

SALEP
Sal"ep, n. Etym: [Ar. sahleb, perhaps a corruption of an Arabic word
for fox, one Ar. name of the orchis signifying literally, fox's
testicles: cf. F. salep.] [Written also saleb, salop, and saloop.]

Defn: The dried tubers of various species of Orchis, and Eulophia. It
is used to make a nutritious beverage by treating the powdered
preparation with hot water. U. S. Disp.

SALERATUS
Sal`e*ra"tus, n. Etym: [NL. sal aëratus; -- so called because it is a
source of fixed air (carbon dioxide). See Sal, and and Aërated.] (Old
Chem.)

Defn: Aërated salt; a white crystalline substance having an alkaline
taste and reaction, consisting of sodium bicarbonate (see under
Sodium.) It is lagerly used in cooking, with sour milk (lactic acid)
or cream of tartar as a substitute for yeast. It is also an
ingridient of most baking powders, and is used in the preparation of
effervescing drinks.

SALESMAN
Sales"man, n.; pl. Salesmen. Etym: [Sale + man.]

Defn: One who sells anything; one whose occupation is to sell goods
or merchandise.

SALESWOMAN
Sales"wom`an, n.; pl. Saleswomen (.

Defn: A woman whose occupation is to sell goods or merchandise.

SALEWORK
Sale"work`, n.

Defn: Work or things made for sale; hence, work done carelessly or
slightingly. Shak.

SALIAN
Sa"lian, a.

Defn: Denoting a tribe of Franks who established themselves early in
the fourth century on the river Sala [now Yssel]; Salic.
 -- n.

Defn: A Salian Frank.

SALIANT
Sa"li*ant, a. (Her.)

Defn: Same as Salient.

SALIAUNCE
Sal"i*aunce, a. Etym: [See Sally.]

Defn: Salience; onslaught. [Obs.] "So fierce saliaunce." Spenser.

SALIC
Sal"ic, a. Etym: [F. salique, fr. the Salian Franks, who, in the
fifth century, formed a body of laws called in latin leges Salicæ.]

Defn: Of or pertaining to the Salian Franks, or to the Salic law so
called. [Also salique.] Salic law. (a) A code of laws formed by the
Salian Franks in the fifth century. By one provision of this code
women were excluded from the inheritance of landed property. (b)
Specifically, in modern times, a law supposed to be a special
application of the above-mentioned provision, in accordance with
which males alone can inherit the throne. This law has obtained in
France, and at times in other countries of Europe, as Spain.

SALICACEOUS
Sal`i*ca"ceous, a. Etym: [L. salix, -icis, the willow.]

Defn: Belonging or relating to the willow.

SALICIN
Sal"i*cin, n. Etym: [L. salix, -icis, a willow: cf. F. salicine. See
Sallow the tree.] (Chem.)

Defn: A glucoside found in the leaves of several species of willow
(Salix) and poplar, and extracted as a bitter white crystalline
substance.salicyl alcohol glucoside, salicyl alcohol b-D-
glucopyranoside, saligenin b-D-glucopyranoside, C13H18O7. It is used
in biochemistry as a standard substrate for evaluating the potency of
b-glucosidase in enzymatic preparations. It is also an analgesic.

SALICYL
Sal"i*cyl, n. Etym: [Salicin + -yl.] (Chem.)

Defn: The hypothetical radical of salicylic acid and of certain
related compounds.

SALICYLAL
Sal"i*cyl`al, n. Etym: [Salicylic + aldehide.] (Chem.)

Defn: A thin, fragrant, colorless oil, HO.C6H4.CHO, found in the
flowers of meadow sweet (Spiræa), and also obtained by oxidation of
saligenin, etc. It reddens on exposure. Called also salycylol,
salicylic aldehyde, and formerly salicylous, or spiroylous, acid.

SALICYLATE
Sal"i*cyl`ate (-ayt), n. (Chem.)

Defn: A salt of salicylic acid.

SALICYLIC
Sal`i*cyl"ic, n. (Chem.)

Defn: Pertaining to, derived from, or designating, an acid formerly
obtained by fusing salicin with potassium hydroxide, and now made in
large quantities from phenol (carbolic acid) by the action of carbon
dioxide on heated sodium phenolate. It is a white crystalline
substance. It is used as an antiseptic, and in its salts in the
treatment of rheumatism. Called also hydroxybenzoic acid.

SALICYLIDE
Sal"i*cyl`ide, n. Etym: [Salicylic + anhydride.] (Chem.)

Defn: A white crystalline substance obtained by dehydration of
salicylic acid.

SALICYLITE
Sal"i*cyl`ite, n. (Chem.)

Defn: A compound of salicylal; -- named after the analogy of a salt.

SALICYLOL
Sal"i*cyl`ol, n. Etym: [Salicylic + L. oleum oil.] (Chem.)

Defn: Same as Salicylal.

SALICYLOUS
Sa*lic"y*lous ( or ), a. (Chem.)

Defn: Pertaining to, or designating, a substance called salicylous
acid, and now salicylal. [Obs.]

SALIENCE
Sa"li*ence, n. Etym: [See Salient.]

1. That quality or condition of being salient; a leaping; a springing
forward; an assaulting.

2. The quality or state of projecting, or being projected;
projection; protrusion. Sir W. Hamilton.

SALIENCY
Sa"li*en*cy, n.

Defn: Quality of being salient; hence, vigor. "A fatal lack of poetic
saliency." J. Morley.

SALIENT
Sa"li*ent, a. Etym: [L. saliens, -entis, p.pr. of salire to leap; cf.
F. saillant. See Sally, n. & v. i..]

1. Moving by leaps or springs; leaping; bounding; jumping. "Frogs and
salient animals." Sir T. Browne.

2. Shooting out up; springing; projecting.
He had in himself a salient, living spring of generous and manly
action. Burke.

3. Hence, figuratively, forcing itself on the attention; prominent;
conspicuous; noticeable.
He [Grenville] had neither salient traits, nor general
comprehensiveness of mind. Bancroft.

4. (Math. & Fort.)

Defn: Projectiong outwardly; as, a salient angle; -- opposed to
reëntering. See Illust. of Bastion.

5. (Her.)

Defn: Represented in a leaping position; as, a lion salient. Salient
angle. See Salient, a., 4.
 -- Salient polygon (Geom.), a polygon all of whose angles are
salient.
 -- Salient polyhedron (Geom.), a polyhedron all of whose solid
angles are salient.

SALIENT
Sa"li*ent, a. (Fort.)

Defn: A salient angle or part; a projection.

SALIENTLY
Sa"li*ent*ly, adv.

Defn: In a salient manner.

SALIFEROUS
Sa*lif"er*ous, a. Etym: [L. sal salt + -ferous.]

Defn: Producing, or impregnated with, salt. Saliferous rocks (Geol.),
the New Red Sandstone system of some geologists; -- so called
because, in Europe, this formation contains beds of salt. The
saliferous beds of New York State belong largely to the Salina period
of the Upper Silurian. See the Chart of Geology.

SALIFIABLE
Sal"i*fi`a*ble, a. Etym: [Cf. F. salifiable. See Salify.] (Chem.)

Defn: Capable of neutralizing an acid to form a salt; -- said of
bases; thus, ammonia is salifiable.

SALIFICATION
Sal`i*fi*ca"tion, n. Etym: [Cf. F. salification.] (Chem.)

Defn: The act, process, or result of salifying; the state of being
salified.

SALIFY
Sal"i*fy, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Salified; p. pr. & vb. n. Salifying.]
Etym: [F. salifier; from L. sal salt + -ficare (only in comp.) to
make. See -fy.] (Chem.)
(a) To combine or impregnate with a salt.
(b) To form a salt with; to convert into a salt; as, to salify a base
or an acid.

SALIGENIN
Sa*lig"e*nin, n. Etym: [Salicin + -gen.] (Chem.)

Defn: A phenol alcohol obtained, by the decomposition of salicin, as
a white crystalline substance; -- called also hydroxy-benzyl alcohol.

SALIGOT
Sal"i*got, n. Etym: [F.] (Bot.)

Defn: The water chestnut (Trapa natans).

SALIMETER
Sal*im"e*ter, n. Etym: [L. sal salt + -meter.]

Defn: An instrument for measuring the amount of salt present in any
given solution. [Written also salometer.]

SALIMETRY
Sal*im"e*try, n.

Defn: The art or process of measuring the amount of salt in a
substance.

SALINA
Sa*li"na, n. Etym: [Cf. L. salinae, pl., salt works, from sal salt.
See Saline, a.]

1. A salt marsh, or salt pond, inclosed from the sea.

2. Salt works.

SALINA PERIOD
Sa*li"na pe"ri*od. Etym: [So called from Salina, a town in New York.]
(Geol.)

Defn: The period in which the American Upper Silurian system,
containing the brine-producing rocks of central New York, was formed.
See the Chart of Geology.

SALINATION
Sal`i*na"tion, n.

Defn: The act of washing with salt water. [R. & Obs..] Greenhill.

SALINE
Sa"line ( or ; 277), a. Etym: [F. salin, fr. L. sal salt: cf. L.
salinae salt works, salinum saltcellar. See Salt.]

1. Consisting of salt, or containing salt; as, saline particles;
saline substances; a saline cathartic.

2. Of the quality of salt; salty; as, a saline taste.

SALINE
Sa"line ( or ; 277), n. Etym: [Cf. F. saline. See Saline, a.]

Defn: A salt spring; a place where salt water is collected in the
earth.

SALINE
Sal"ine, n.

1. (Chem.)

Defn: A crude potash obtained from beet-root residues and other
similar sources. [Written also salin.]

2. (Med. Chem.)

Defn: A metallic salt; esp., a salt of potassium, sodium, lithium, or
magnesium, used in medicine.

SALINENESS
Sa*line"ness, n.

Defn: The quality or state of being salt; saltness.

SALINIFEROUS
Sal`i*nif"er*ous, a. Etym: [Saline + -ferous.]

Defn: Same as Saliferous.

SALINIFORM
Sa*lin"i*form, a.

Defn: Having the form or the qualities of a salt, especially of
common salt.

SALINITY
Sa*lin"i*ty, n.

Defn: Salineness. Carpenter.

SALINOMETER
Sal`i*nom"e*ter, n. Etym: [Saline + -meter.]

Defn: A salimeter.

SALINOUS
Sa*lin"ous, a.

Defn: Saline. [Obs.]

SALIQUE
Sal"ique ( or ), a. Etym: [F.]

Defn: Salic. Shak.
She fulmined out her scorn of laws salique. Tennyson.

SALIRETIN
Sal`i*re"tin, n. Etym: [Saligenin + Gr. (Chem.)

Defn: A yellow amorphous resinoid substance obtained by the action of
dilute acids on saligenin.

SALISBURIA
Sal`is*bu"ri*a, n. Etym: [Named after R. A. Salisbury, an English
botanist.] (Bot.)

Defn: The ginkgo tree (Ginkgo biloba, or Salisburia adiantifolia).

SALITE
Sal"ite, v. t. Etym: [L. salitus, p.p. of salire to salt, fr. sal
salt.]

Defn: To season with salt; to salt. [Obs.]

SALITE
Sa"lite, n. Etym: [So called from Sala, a town in Sweden.] (Min.)

Defn: A massive lamellar variety of pyroxene, of a dingy green color.
[Written also sahlite.]

SALIVA
Sa*li"va, n. Etym: [L.; cf. Gr. (Physiol.)

Defn: The secretion from the salivary glands.

Note: In man the saliva is a more or less turbid and slighty viscid
fluid, generally of an alkaline reaction, and is secreted by the
parotid, submaxillary, and sublingual glands. In the mouth the saliva
is mixed with the secretion from the buccal glands. The secretions
from the individual salivary glands have their own special
characteristics, and these are not the same in all animals. In man
and many animals mixed saliva, i.e., saliva composed of the
secretions of all three of the salivary glands, is an important
degestive fluid on account of the presence of the peculiar enzyme,
ptyalin.

SALIVAL
Sa*li"val, a.

Defn: Salivary.

SALIVANT
Sal"i*vant, a. Etym: [L. salivans, p.pr. of salivare. See Salivate.]

Defn: Producing salivation.

SALIVANT
Sal"i*vant, n.

Defn: That which produces salivation.

SALIVARY
Sal"i*va*ry, a. Etym: [L. salivarius slimy, clammy: cf. F.
salivaire.] (Physiol.)

Defn: Of or pertaining to saliva; producing or carrying saliva; as,
the salivary ferment; the salivary glands; the salivary ducts, etc.

SALIVATE
Sal"i*vate, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Salivated; p. pr. & vb. n.
Salivating.] Etym: [L. salivatus, p.p. of salivare to salivate. See
Saliva.]

Defn: To produce an abnormal flow of saliva in; to produce salivation
or ptyalism in, as by the use of mercury. over.; as, salivate over
the prospects of high profits from an enterprise.

Note: Probably influenced by the experiments of Pavlov, who trained
dogs to salivate at the sound of a bell, by previously ringing the
bell immediately prior to feeding them.

SALIVATION
Sal`i*va"tion, n. Etym: [L. salivatio: cf. F. salivation.] (Physiol.)

Defn: The act or process of salivating; an excessive secretion of
saliva, often accompained with soreness of the mouth and gums;
ptyalism.

Note: It may be induced by direct chemical or mechanical stimulation,
as in mastication of some tasteless substance like rubber, or
indirectly by some agent which affects the whole system, as mercury
compounds.

SALIVOUS
Sa*li"vous, a. Etym: [L. salivosus: cf. F. saliveux.]

Defn: Pertaining to saliva; of the nature of saliva.

SALIX
Sa"lix, n.; pl. Salices. Etym: [L., the willow.] (Bot.)
(a) A genus of trees or shrubs including the willow, osier, and the
like, growing usually in wet grounds.
(b) A tree or shrub of any kind of willow.

SALLENDERS
Sal"len*ders, n. pl. Etym: [F. solandres, solandre.] (Far.)

Defn: An eruption on the hind leg of a horse. [Written also
sellanders, and sellenders.]
On the inside of the hock, or a little below it, as well as at the
bend of the knee, there is occasionally a scurfy eruption called
"mallenders" in the fore leg, and "sallenders" in the hind leg.
Youatt.

SALLET
Sal"let, n. Etym: [F. salade, Sp. celada, or It. celata, fr. L.
(cassis) caelata, fr. caelare, caelatum, to engrave in relief. So
called from the figures engraved upon it.]

Defn: A light kind of helmet, with or without a visor, introduced
during the 15th century. [Written also salade.]
Then he must have a sallet wherewith his head may be saved. Latimer.

SALLET; SALLETING
Sal"let, Sal"let*ing, n.

Defn: Salad. [Obs.] Shak.

SALLIANCE
Sal"li*ance, n.

Defn: Salience. [Obs.]

SALLOW
Sal"low, n. Etym: [OE. salwe, AS. sealth; akin to OHG. salaha, G.
salwiede, Icel. selja L. salix, Ir. sail, saileach, Gael. seileach,
W. helyg, Gr.

1. The willow; willow twigs. [Poetic] Tennyson.
And bend the pliant sallow to a shield. Fawkes.
The sallow knows the basketmaker's thumb. Emerson.

2. (Bot.)

Defn: A name given to certain species of willow, especially those
which do not have flexible shoots, as Salix caprea, S. cinerea, etc.
Sallow thorn (Bot.), a European thorny shrub (Hippophae rhamnoides)
much like an Elæagnus. The yellow berries are sometimes used for
making jelly, and the plant affords a yellow dye.

SALLOW
Sal"low, a. [Compar. Sallower; superl. Sallowest.] Etym: [AS. salu;
akin to D. zaluw, OHG. salo, Icel. sölr yellow.]

Defn: Having a yellowish color; of a pale, sickly color, tinged with
yellow; as, a sallow skin. Shak.

SALLOW
Sal"low, v. t.

Defn: To tinge with sallowness. [Poetic]
July breathes hot, sallows the crispy fields. Lowell.

SALLOWISH
Sal"low*ish, a.

Defn: Somewhat sallow. Dickens.

SALLOWNESS
Sal"low*ness, n.

Defn: The quality or condition of being sallow. Addison.

SALLY
Sal"ly, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Sallied; p. pr. & vb. n. Sallying.] Etym:
[F. saillir, fr. L. salire to leap, spring, akin to gr. Sallient,
Assail, Assault, Exult, Insult, Saltation, Saltire.]

Defn: To leap or rush out; to burst forth; to issue suddenly; as a
body of troops from a fortified place to attack besiegers; to make a
sally.
They break the truce, and sally out by night. Dryden.
The foe retires, -- she heads the sallying host. Byron.

SALLY
Sal"ly, n.; pl. Sallies. Etym: [F. saillie, fr. sailir. See Sally,
v.]

1. A leaping forth; a darting; a spring.

2. A rushing or bursting forth; a quick issue; a sudden eruption;
specifically, an issuing of troops from a place besieged to attack
the besiegers; a sortie.
Sallies were made by the Spaniards, but they were beaten in with
loss. Bacon.

3. An excursion from the usual track; range; digression; deviation.
Every one shall know a country better that makes often sallies into
it, and traverses it up and down, than he that . . . goes still round
in the same track. Locke.

4. A flight of fancy, liveliness, wit, or the like; a flashing forth
of a quick and active mind.
The unaffected mirth with which she enjoyed his sallies. Sir W.
Scott.

5. Transgression of the limits of soberness or steadiness; act of
levity; wild gayety; frolic; escapade.
The excursion was esteemed but a sally of youth. Sir H. Wotton.
Sally port. (a) (Fort.) A postern gate, or a passage underground,
from the inner to the outer works, to afford free egress for troops
in a sortie. (b) (Naval) A large port on each quarter of a fireship,
for the escape of the men into boats when the train is fired; a large
port in an old-fashioned three-decker or a large modern ironclad.

SALLY LUNN
Sal"ly Lunn". Etym: [From a woman, Sally Lunn, who is said to have
first made the cakes, and sold them in the streets of Bath, Eng.]

Defn: A tea cake slighty sweetened, and raised with yeast, baked in
the form of biscuits or in a thin loaf, and eaten hot with butter.

SALLYMAN
Sal"ly*man, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The velella; -- called also saleeman.

SALM
Salm, n.

Defn: Psalm. [Obs.] Piers plowman.

SALMAGUNDI
Sal`ma*gun"di, n. Etym: [F. salmigondis of uncertain origin; perhaps
from L. salgama condita, pl.; salgama pickles + condita preserved
(see Condite); or from the Countess Salmagondi, lady of honor to
Maria de Medici, who is said to have invented it; or cf. It. salame
salt meat, and F. salmis a ragout.]

1. A mixture of chopped meat and pickled herring, with oil, vinegar,
pepper, and onions. Johnson.

2. Hence, a mixture of various ingredients; an olio or medley; a
potpourri; a miscellany. W. Irving.

SALMI
Sal"mi, n. (Cookery)

Defn: Same as Salmis.

SALMIAC
Sal"mi*ac, n. Etym: [Cf. F. salmiac, G. salmiak.] (Old Chem.)

Defn: Sal ammoniac. See under Sal.

SALMIS
Sal`mis", n. Etym: [F.] (Cookery)

Defn: A ragout or partky roasted game stewed with sauce, wine, bread,
and condiments suited to provoke appetite.

SALMON
Salm"on, n.; pl. Salmons or (collectively) Salmon. Etym: [OE.
saumoun, salmon, F. saumon, fr. L. salmo, salmonis perhaps from
salire to leap. Cf. Sally, v.]

1. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of several species of fishes of the genus Salmo and
allied genera. The common salmon (Salmo salar) of Northern Europe and
Eastern North America, and the California salmon, or quinnat, are the
most important species. They are extensively preserved for food. See
Quinnat.

Note: The salmons ascend rivers and penetrate to their head streams
to spawn. They are remarkably strong fishes, and will even leap over
considerable falls which lie in the way of their progress. The common
salmon has been known to grow to the weight of seventy-five pounds;
more generally it is from fifteen to twenty-five pounds. Young salmon
are called parr, peal, smolt, and grilse. Among the true salmons are:
Black salmon, or Lake salmon, the namaycush.
 -- Dog salmon, a salmon of Western North America (Oncorhynchus
keta).
 -- Humpbacked salmon, a Pacific-coast salmon (Oncorhynchus
gorbuscha).
 -- King salmon, the quinnat.
 -- Landlocked salmon, a variety of the common salmon (var. Sebago),
long confined in certain lakes in consequence of obstructions that
prevented it from returning to the sea. This last is called also
dwarf salmon. Among fishes of other families which are locally and
erroneously called salmon are: the pike perch, called jack salmon;
the spotted, or southern, squeteague; the cabrilla, called kelp
salmon; young pollock, called sea salmon; and the California
yellowtail.

2. A reddish yellow or orange color, like the flesh of the salmon.
Salmon berry (Bot.), a large red raspberry growing from Alaska to
California, the fruit of the Rubus Nutkanus.
 -- Salmon killer (Zoöl.), a stickleback (Gasterosteus cataphractus)
of Western North America and Northern Asia.
 -- Salmon ladder, salmon stair. See Fish ladder, under Fish.
 -- Salmon peel, a young salmon.
 -- Salmon pipe, a certain device for catching salmon. Crabb.
 -- Salmon trout. (Zoöl.) (a) The European sea trout (Salmo trutta).
It resembles the salmon, but is smaller, and has smaller and more
numerous scales. (b) The American namaycush. (c) A name that is also
applied locally to the adult black spotted trout (Salmo purpuratus),
and to the steel head and other large trout of the Pacific coast.

SALMON
Salm"on, a.

Defn: Of a reddish yellow or orange color, like that of the flesh of
the salmon.

SALMONET
Salm"on*et, n. Etym: [Cf. Samlet.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A salmon of small size; a samlet.

SALMONOID
Sal"mon*oid, a. Etym: [Salmon + -oid.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: Like, or pertaining to, the Salmonidæ, a family of fishes
including the trout and salmon.
 -- n.

Defn: Any fish of the family Salmonidæ.

SALOGEN
Sal"o*gen, n. Etym: [L. sal salt + -gen.] (Chem.)

Defn: A halogen. [Obs.]

SALOL
Sal"ol, n. Etym: [Salicylic + -ol.] (Chem.)

Defn: A white crystalline substance consisting of phenol salicylate.

SALOMETER
sa*lom"e*ter, n.

Defn: See Salimeter.

SALOMETRY
Sa*lom"e*try, n.

Defn: Salimetry.

SALON
Sa`lon", n. Etym: [F. See Saloon.]

Defn: An apartment for the reception of company; hence, in the
plural, faschionable parties; circles of fashionable society.

SALON
Sa`lon", n.

Defn: An apartment for the reception and exhibition of works of art;
hence, an annual exhibition of paintings, sculptures, etc., held in
Paris by the Society of French Artists; -- sometimes called the Old
Salon. New Salon is a popular name for an annual exhibition of
paintings, sculptures, etc., held in Paris at the Champs de Mars, by
the Société Nationale des Beaux-Arts (National Society of Fine Arts),
a body of artists who, in 1890, seceded from the Société des Artistes
Français (Society of French Artists).

SALOON
Sa*loon", n. Etym: [F. salon (cf. It. salone), fr. F. salle a large
room, a hall, of German or Dutch origin; cf. OHG. sal house, hall, G.
saal; akin to AS. sæl, sele, D. zaal, Icel. salr, Goth. saljan to
dwell, and probably to L. solum ground. Cf. Sole of the foot, Soil
ground, earth.]

1. A spacious and elegant apartment for the reception of company or
for works of art; a hall of reception, esp. a hall for public
entertainments or amusements; a large room or parlor; as, the saloon
of a steamboat.
The gilden saloons in which the first magnates of the realm . . .
gave banquets and balls. Macaulay.

2. Popularly, a public room for specific uses; esp., a barroom or
grogshop; as, a drinking saloon; an eating saloon; a dancing saloon.
We hear of no hells, or low music halls, or low dancing saloons [at
Athens.] J. P. Mahaffy.

SALOOP
Sa*loop", n.

Defn: An aromatic drink prepared from sassafras bark and other
ingredients, at one time much used in London. J. Smith (Dict. econ.
Plants). Saloop bush (Bot.), an Australian shrub (Rhagodia hastata)
of the Goosefoot family, used for fodder.

SALP
Salp, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any species of Salpa, or of the family Salpidæ.

SALPA
Sal"pa, n.; pl. L. Salpæ, E. Salpas. Etym: [NL.: cf. L. salpa a kind
of stockfish.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A genus of transparent, tubular, free-swimming oceanic
tunicates found abundantly in all the warmer latitudes. See
Illustration in Appendix.

Note: Each species exists in two distinct forms, one of which lives
solitary, and produces, by budding from an internal organ, a series
of the other kind. These are united together, side by side, so as to
form a chain, or cluster, often of large size. Each of the
individuals composing the chain carries a single egg, which develops
into the solitary kind.

SALPIAN; SALPID
Sal"pi*an, Sal"pid, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A salpa.

SALPICON
Sal"pi*con, n. Etym: [F. salpicon, Sp. salpicon.]

Defn: Chopped meat, bread, etc., used to stuff legs of veal or other
joints; stuffing; farce. Bacon.

SALPINGITIS
Sal`pin*gi"tis, n. Etym: [NL. See Salpinx, and -itis.] (Med.)

Defn: Inflammation of the salpinx.

SALPINX
Sal"pinx, n. Etym: [NL., from Gr. (Old Anat.)

Defn: The Eustachian tube, or the Fallopian tube.

SALSAFY
Sal"sa*fy, n. (Bot.)

Defn: See Salsify.

SALSAMENTARIOUS
Sal`sa*men*ta"ri*ous, a. Etym: [L. salsamentarius, fr. salsamentum
brine, pickled fish, fr. salsus salted, p.p. of salire to salt.]

Defn: Salt; salted; saline. [R.]

SALSE
Salse, n. Etym: [F.]

Defn: A mud volcano, the water of which is often impregnated with
salts, whence the name.

SALSIFY
Sal"si*fy, n. Etym: [F. salsifis.] (Bot.)

Defn: See Oyster plant (a), under Oyster.

SALSO-ACID
Sal"so-ac`id, a. Etym: [L. salsus salted, salt + acidus acid.]

Defn: Having a taste compounded of saltness and acidity; both salt
and acid. [R.]

SALSODA
Sal`so"da, n.

Defn: See Sal soda, under Sal.

SALSOLA
Sal"so*la, n. Etym: [NL., fr. L. salsus salt, because they contain
alkaline salts.] (Bot.)

Defn: A genus of plants including the glasswort. See Glasswort.

SALSUGINOUS
sal*su"gi*nous, a. Etym: [L. salsugo, -ginis, saltness from salsus
salted, salt: cf. F. salsugineux.] (Bot.)

Defn: Growing in brackish places or in salt marches.

SALT
Salt, n. Etym: [AS. sealt; akin to OS. & OFries. salt, D. zout, G.
salz, Icel., Sw., & Dan. salt, L. sal, Gr. sole, Ir. & Gael. salann,
W. halen, of unknown origin. Cf. Sal, Salad, Salary, Saline, Sauce,
Sausage.]

1. The chloride of sodium, a substance used for seasoning food, for
the preservation of meat, etc. It is found native in the earth, and
is also produced, by evaporation and crystallization, from sea water
and other water impregnated with saline particles.

2. Hence, flavor; taste; savor; smack; seasoning.
Though we are justices and doctors and churchmen . . . we have some
salt of our youth in us. Shak.

3. Hence, also, piquancy; wit; sense; as, Attic salt.

4. A dish for salt at table; a saltcellar.
I out and bought some things; among others, a dozen of silver salts.
Pepys.

5. A sailor; -- usually qualified by old. [Colloq.]
Around the door are generally to be seen, laughing and gossiping,
clusters of old salts. Hawthorne.

6. (Chem.)

Defn: The neutral compound formed by the union of an acid base; thus,
sulphuric acid and iron form the salt sulphate of iron or green
vitriol.

Note: Except in case of ammonium salts, accurately speaking, it is
the acid radical which unites with the base or basic radical, with
the elimination of hydrogen, of water, or of analogous compounds as
side products. In the case of diacid and triacid bases, and of
dibasic and tribasic acids, the mutual neutralization may vary in
degree, producing respectively basic, neutral, or acid salts See
Phrases below.

7. Fig.: That which preserves from corruption or error; that which
purifies; a corrective; an antiseptic; also, an allowance or
deduction; as, his statements must be taken with a grain of salt.
Ye are the salt of the earth. Matt. v. 13.

8. pl.

Defn: Any mineral salt used as an aperient or cathartic, especially
Epsom salts, Rochelle salt, or Glauber's salt.

9. pl.

Defn: Marches flooded by the tide. [Prov. Eng.] Above the salt, Below
the salt, phrases which have survived the old custom, in the houses
of people of rank, of placing a large saltcellar near the middle of a
long table, the places above which were assigned to the guests of
distinction, and those below to dependents, inferiors, and poor
relations. See Saltfoot.
His fashion is not to take knowledge of him that is beneath him in
clothes. He never drinks below the salt. B. Jonson.
-- Acid salt (Chem.) (a) A salt derived from an acid which has
several replaceable hydrogen atoms which are only partially exchanged
for metallic atoms or basic radicals; as, acid potassium sulphate is
an acid salt. (b) A salt, whatever its constitution, which merely
gives an acid reaction; thus, copper sulphate, which is composed of a
strong acid united with a weak base, is an acid salt in this sense,
though theoretically it is a neutral salt.
 -- Alkaline salt (Chem.), a salt which gives an alkaline reaction,
as sodium carbonate.
 -- Amphid salt (Old Chem.), a salt of the oxy type, formerly
regarded as composed of two oxides, an acid and a basic oxide.
[Obsolescent] -- Basic salt (Chem.) (a) A salt which contains more of
the basic constituent than is required to neutralize the acid. (b) An
alkaline salt.
 -- Binary salt (Chem.), a salt of the oxy type conveniently regarded
as composed of two ingredients (analogously to a haloid salt), viz.,
a metal and an acid radical.
 -- Double salt (Chem.), a salt regarded as formed by the union of
two distinct salts, as common alum, potassium aluminium sulphate. See
under Double.
 -- Epsom salts. See in the Vocabulary.
 -- Essential salt (Old Chem.), a salt obtained by crystalizing plant
juices.
 -- Ethereal salt. (Chem.) See under Ethereal.
 -- Glauber's salt or salts. See in Vocabulary.
 -- Haloid salt (Chem.), a simple salt of a halogen acid, as sodium
chloride.
 -- Microcosmic salt. (Chem.). See under Microcosmic.
 -- Neutral salt. (Chem.) (a A salt in which the acid and base (in
theory) neutralize each other. (b) A salt which gives a neutral
reaction.
 -- Oxy salt (Chem.), a salt derived from an oxygen acid.
 -- Per salt (Old Chem.), a salt supposed to be derived from a
peroxide base or analogous compound. [Obs.] -- Permanent salt, a salt
which undergoes no change on exposure to the air.
 -- Proto salt (Chem.), a salt derived from a protoxide base or
analogous compound.
 -- Rochelle salt. See under Rochelle.
 -- Salt of amber (Old Chem.), succinic acid.
 -- Salt of colcothar (Old Chem.), green vitriol, or sulphate of
iron.
 -- Salt of hartshorn. (Old Chem.) (a) Sal ammoniac, or ammonium
chloride. (b) Ammonium carbonate. Cf. Spirit of hartshorn, under
Hartshorn.
 -- Salt of lemons. (Chem.) See Salt of sorrel, below.
 -- Salt of Saturn (Old Chem.), sugar of lead; lead acetate; -- the
alchemical of lead being Saturn.
 -- Salt of Seignette. Same as Rochelle salt.
 -- Salt of soda (Old Chem.), sodium carbonate.
 -- Salt of sorrel (Old Chem.), acid potassium oxalate, or potassium
quadroxalate, used as a solvent for ink stains; -- so called because
found in the sorrel, or Oxalis. Also sometimes inaccurately called
salt of lemon.
 -- Salt of tartar (Old Chem.), potassium carbonate; -- so called
because formerly made by heating cream of tartar, or potassium
tartrate. [Obs.] -- Salt of Venus (Old Chem.), blue vitriol; copper
sulphate; -- the alchemical name of copper being Venus.
 -- Salt of wisdom. See Alembroth.
 -- Sedative salt (Old Med. Chem.), boric acid.
 -- Sesqui salt (Chem.), a salt derived from a sesquioxide base or
analogous compound.
 -- Spirit of salt. (Chem.) See under Spirit.
 -- Sulpho salt (Chem.), a salt analogous to an oxy salt, but
containing sulphur in place of oxygen.